Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
Number of Reviews
33

Author
Edwin Jahiel
WAG THE DOG ** 1/2. Directed by Barry Levinson. Written by Hilary Henkin &
David Mamet from the book "American Hero" by Larry Beinhart. Photography,
Robert Richardson. Production design, Wynn Thomas. Editing, Stu Linder.
Music, Mark Knopfler. Cast: Dustin Hoffman, Robert De Niro, Anne Heche,
Denis Leary, Willie Nelson, Woody Harrelson (uncredited), et al. A New Line
release. 93 min. Rated R (language).
At any given moment movie genres come in twos, threes or in wolfpacks.
Currently playing are "Wag the Dog," a shaggy dog story without a dog, and
"As Good as It Gets," a shaggy dog story with a dog. The title "Wag the
Dog" suggests another kiddie movie about a friendly hound, It is not. It's
an adult (sort of) satire of politics, Hollywood, and the media. And
although beautifully acted and intermittently quite funny, I find that its
premise is mean and opportunistic as the inspiration obviously comes from
headlines about President Clinton. It is all the stranger since, chances
are, the filmmakers are Democrats.
The President of the United States has been charged by a young girl  of
molesting her when she was touring the White House with a group of Firefly
Girls, whatever those are. By the horniest stretch of imagination, the
accusation is unbelievable, but as the country is only days away from  an
election, it can do irreparable harm.
The President is away in China (collecting Chinese votes???!!!). His
desperate aide Winifred Ames (Heche) calls Conrad Brean (De Niro) to a top
secret meeting in a White House bunker. Brean, a Mr. Fixit spin doctor opts
for a major diversion. He enlists Hollywood producer Stanley Motss,
pronounced Moss (Hoffman) to fabricate an imaginary war with Albania --a
ludicrous, farcical yet clever choice given America's ignorance of
geography. The conflict comes complete with phony documentary footage made
easy (and funny) by digital techniques. It includes references to a
nonexistent new bomber (an airplane that is). A country singer (Willie
Nelson) is hired to write a patriotic parody of "We Are the World" that
massed choirs perform.
In its last section the plot somehow gets lost. The end of the "crisis"
tries to top the fabulation with a returning war hero who is not what was
expected. This is a strictly from hunger development, though Woody
Harrelson has memorable presence. They baptize him Schumann (read Shoe Man)
and incite the public to pepper the country with symbolic shoes (sic).
The hoodwinking of an entire nation is imaginative but never gives you a
chance to suspend your disbelief. The eagerness of the media, especially
TV, to swallow and disseminate the "news," the gullibility of the nation
and its leaders, the cooperation of the military go from very, very, very
marginally believable to incredible..
The other element is the comically exaggerated. But whereas in a gem like
"Dr. Strangelove" the roles are out and out caricatural, here their
outrageousness is semi-realistic as both Washington and Hollywood converge
in their belief that, in De Niro's words, "war is show business." Dustin
Hoffman, in his physical and temperamental likeness to and parody of the
outrageous producer Robert Evans, merely pushes the envelope, which he does
with great gusto. With frantic pacing and faster and faster talk (a
contemporary variant of Howard Hawks' screwball comedies), under the lead
of he agitated Hoffman and the unflappable De Niro, there is an avalanche
of in-jokes about movie-makers and politicos.
What motivates Hoffman is twofold: his gripe that producers don't get
Oscars, and his compulsion to produce the Himalaya of his career. This is
amusing, up to a point. The yak yak however tries to pack too many esoteric
references that contribute to some troughs of monotony. The dog barks but
does not bite, the film does not open eyes or soar to a higher level. Its
parts can be entertaining but their sum stays on the ground.

Author
E. Benjmain Kelsey
It's a good thing WAG THE DOG didn't use some of the special effects Robert
Zemeckis favors (and heavily showed off in CONTACT), because if President
Clinton had been "morphed" into the film, Barry Levinson may have become the
Nostradamus of modern political scandal. Perhaps a sequel is in order, and
this time we *can* put Clinton in it, and this time we'll also show the
President's mistress (Monica Lewinsky superimposed into the scene), and this
time when Bubba bares all, we'll simply call it FLUBBER 2. Or, with Clinton
and Lewinsky both blended into the picture, maybe the suitable title will be
SPLICE WORLD. Oh what fun we can have watching Bill do a bad Blues Brother
impression, blaring on his saxophone while Lewinsky sings a catchy dance-pop
tune. ("If you wanna be my lover, you gotta get with the Pres"?)
One must admit, the latest White House scandal riding the coattails of WAG THE
DOG's national release is more than interesting. Who would've thought this
movie would serve as the opening act to a scandal that has gone on to dominate
headlines and news magazines for the past few months? I can only assume it has
helped WAG THE DOG bring in more business as residents of the good ole U.S.A.
flock into theaters to see how closely the outside world parallels that on the
big screen. But WAG THE DOG's focus remains more on covering the scandal than
on the scandal itself. When the President is accused of sexual misconduct
around election time, he enlists the aid of the White House's top spin doctor,
Conrad Brean (Robert De Niro), to deviate the public's attention from such
crushing allegations. In turn, Conrad enlists the aid of acclaimed Hollywood
producer Stanley Motts (Hoffman) to fabricate some overseas conflicts . . .
not quite a war, but a "pageant".
Picking Albania as the hot spot to ensure Americans' knowledge will remain
minimal, Motts hires some of his best to create "genuine" news footage,
legendary heros, and even an overly patriotic theme song. The acting is sharp,
the script clever, but there is also plenty to improve on. WAG THE DOG is too
much idea and not enough story. The pacing is hectic, creating the right
atmosphere for what's going on onscreen, but as beautifully presented as it
is, it would work much better as a thirty minute short. While one can easily
walk away from this film appreciating its biting satire and powerful cast, it
doesn't stretch far beyond a really, really good idea. Speaking for myself, I
want just a bit more.
De Niro has received quite a bit of praise for his role here, and although he
was delightfully on key, it is Hoffman who gives the only truly stellar
performance. It's obvious this project was a bit of a trip to the candy store
for both Levinson and Hoffman. The acting adrenaline is high, and Hoffman
reflects it well. On the other hand, we also have Anne Heche as White House
aide Winifred Ames. If you believe this movie, it appears that White House
aides do nothing more than sit around looking bored out of their minds. Heche
seems to add nothing more than a tranquil backdrop to an otherwise eccentric
cast of chatter-box characters.
Not only the direction of the film is hectic - the camera work by Robert
Richardson is also a bit hyper, with sudden unnecessary zooms and pans that
made me dizzy. It's a bit distracting when you feel like you're watching a
political documentary shot by Mtv. Still, the intelligent comedy is a rare
thing nowadays, and this one is incredibly smart. For that aspect alone, WAG
THE DOG is one to see. With all the hoopla over Clinton going on however, it's
not much of an escape from the real world.

Author
Boyd Petrie
Starring: Dustin Hoffman, Robert De Niro, Anne Heche, Kirsten Dunst,
Willie Nelson, Denis Leary.
Sitting in the theater, waiting for WAG THE DOG to begin, I was struck
by the number of politically-themed films are about to be released
into theaters.  The previews showed numerous films about politics,
whether it ranged from John Travolta as the President to a AS GOOD AS
IT GETS-Jack Nicholson-type politician.  Why is Hollywood suddenly so
interested in politics?  Because of the controversy, and the obvious
interest of moviegoers.  However, of the two previews I saw, neither
of them looked very interesting.  In one, Travolta plays the
President, with grey hair and all, but he still looks too young for
the role.  The other preview showed a rude President who bashes people
whenever he feels like it (but not on purpose, of course).  Neither of
these films will be as good or as entertaining as WAG THE DOG.
To begin, what exactly does wag the dog mean?  It may sound a little
ridiculous, but it actually gives the film a connection to the
audience.  The opening scene explains to us: "Why does a dog wag its
tail?  Because the dog is smarter than the tail.  If the tail was
smarter, then it would wag the dog."  Throughout the film, director
Barry Levinson and writers David Mamet and Hilary Henkin continually
portray your average American as the dog.  The government is the tail.
WAG THE DOG contains a fair amount of ridiculous events, but none so
far as going beyond belief.  What it does is it plays with the
audience's thoughts of government procedure.  Many people have thought
that the government is lying (more than likely, everyone), telling us
stories to explain things otherwise unexplainable.  WAG THE DOG takes
that a step further, showing us what could possibly happen.
WAG THE DOG begins very quickly, with White House aide Winifred Ames
(Anne Heche) leading spin doctor Conrad Brean (Robert De Niro) down a
series of underground tunnels.  Why do they need Brean?  Because the
President was caught with is pants down.  The President is being
accused of offering himself to a "Firefly Girl," and an underage one
at that.  This may or may not be true, but it doesn't matter, because
once the story hits the television, it becomes fact.  Brean figures
that they need to find something to draw the attention away from the
sexual harassment deal; perhaps, by starting a war with Albania.
Start a war?  Well, not really.
Brean decides that he needs someone to produce his war, and where
better to find someone to do that than in the one place that
specializes in fabricating fictional events--Hollywood.  Brean comes
across Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman), a Hollywood producer whose lack
of acknowledgment for his films has discouraged him from continuing to
produce them.  At first, Motss is apprehensive about getting involved
with the scheme, thinking it's too immense for anyone to pull it off.
However, after seeing Brean's connection to the White House, and
realizing the enjoyment of pulling off such a radical event, Motss
accepts to produce the war.  "We can't tell anyone... it's a pageant,"
Brean remarks.
Most of the fun of WAG THE DOG is derived from the actual production
of war-based paraphernalia.  There's the short video of a young
Albanian girl (played by Kirsten Dunst) running through a destroyed
village.  This was produced using special effects ("The same method
was used in the last Schwarzenegger film.").  There's also the
hilarious production of the musical theme, written by Willie Nelson.
In probably the funniest scene in the film, Nelson makes up a song
about the President and little girls sitting in his lap.  However, the
opposing candidate for the President's chair (Craig T. Nelson) knocks
down rumors of war, and because he said it on television, it must be
true.  Brean and Ames both declare defeat, but Motss thinks the war
just needs a second act.  "We need a hero!" he exclaims.  That hero is
Schumacher (Woody Harrelson), a fictionalized member of the
fictionalized 3-0-3 squadron, who was left behind enemy lines.  This
sparks attention from America, and the President's numbers sky-rocket
when they learn he is being brought home.
For a film such as WAG THE DOG to work, everything must fit together
properly.  And at the top of it must be a good screenplay.  WAG THE
DOG's is among the best of the year, with some of the sharpest
dialogue of the year.  Based on the novel "American Hero," by Larry
Beinhart, it took David Mamet (arguably the best dialogue writer ever)
and Hilary Henkin to adapt it for the screen.  The screenplay is so
witty that a lot of the humor may just go over the heads of viewers.
Some of it went over my head, but I laughed anyway.  However, most of
the humor is very sharp and, directed at politics, makes it extremely
funny.  Heck, if you can't laugh at politics...  The premise of WAG
THE DOG is among the very best of satire, and probably the best of the
year.  It seems like a ridiculous idea (the government messing with
the media), but watching WAG THE DOG, a sudden fear overwhelms you:
it's just plausible enough to really happen.  The film points fingers
at everyday Americans as being too gullible.  Anything we see on TV
must be true, but WAG THE DOG shows it as being falsified by the
government in order to ensure the President's success.
This is Dustin Hoffman's second film this year about using the media
to gain attention for someone, but in WAG THE DOG, he gives the best
performance I have seen him give since TOOTSIE.  Hoffman has so much
enthusiasm in the film that it vastly contrasts the uptight De Niro.
De Niro also gives a very good performance, but much more subdued than
he normally is.  De Niro and Hoffman play well of each other, and to
add to that, there's a load of big-name stars in small roles.  Anne
Heche is wonderful as Winifred Ames, a colorful and vibrant character
whose hard outside persona hides a vulnerable side.  In smaller roles
are Kirsten Dunst (whom I would have gladly liked to see more of) as
the actress hired to play an Albanian, Wood Harrelson as "The Old
Shoe" hero (his psycho performance is entertaining, but very limited),
James Belushi, William H. Macy as an NSA official, Michael Belson as
the President (only seen from behind and out of focus shots), Jay
Leno, Craig T. Nelson, Denis Leary, and Willie Nelson.  All of these
performances are good, and the film shows that big-name stars will
take small roles just to be in it.
WAG THE DOG is rated R for language.  Director Barry Levinson has
produced a remarkably funny film on a remarkably small budget.  The
direction is tight and crisp, but never reveals itself.  The music by
Mark Knopfler was a little annoying at first, but quickly it took
ahold of my attention and gave the film an added bonus.  It's really a
catchy soundtrack.  However, there are some minor flaws in the film.
The cinematography occasionally draws attention to itself with strange
camera movements, and the ending is a little depressing.  I question
whether or not the screenplay ended correctly, but it ends with a
satirical approach to dark humor, and it ends up being funny anyway.
Overall, WAG THE DOG is probably the best bet for a comedy right now,
and definitely in the line-up for Oscar contenders.
Reviewed by Respect (respect@aros.net)
http://www.aros.net/~respect/movies.html

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Barry Levinson
Writers: David Mamet and Hilary Menken (based on the novel "American
Hero" by Larry Beinhert)
Starring: Robert DeNiro, Dustin Hoffman, Anne Heche, Denis Leary, Willie
Nelson, Kirsten Dunst, William H. Macy, Craig T. Nelson, Woody
Harrelson, David Koechner, Harland Williams, James Belushi, Jay Leno
Before I saw this film, I thought that films like this weren't even made
anymore.  You know: the comedy that causes you to laugh the whole time,
but contains another level to it that might even creep you out to think
about.  While we're laughing hysterically at it, we can't help have a
couple moments pause to think about how truthful this whole film is.  I
mean, thanks to Oliver Stone, we all know that the government lies to us
- but this film expounds on that idea to say that not only does the
government lie to us, but the media, whom we usually trust, helps them
out.
In this film, the President (of the United States) has eleven days until
election day, and it has just been discovered that he did some hanky
panky with a "Firefly Girl," opening up a huge scandal that could
obviously destroy him (in fact, the other Presidential candidate, played
by Craig T. Nelson, starts airing campaign commercials featuring that
Maurie Chevalier classic, "Thank Heaven for Little Girls").  So the
White House staff calls for Conrad Breen (Robert DeNiro) to help them
out.
Conrad is the best spin doctor in the business, and is capable of coming
up with wacky yet plausible lies to cover up almost any scandal.  But,
teamed with presidential aide Winifred Ames (Anne Heche), he goes to
Hollywood for help, as this one's a little hard to do.  He journeys to
the mansion of Hollywood producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman, tanned
to the brim) to help him produce a war, which is to be against Albania
because those darn Albanians are apparently harboring a nuclear weapon
in Canada that is about to make its way to the states...or so Conrad
says.
With Stanley, the three begin to stage a war, since war is not really
about killing, but about marketing.  Civilian americans are never on the
battlefront, and rely on the media to alert them about it, so why not
use the medium against them, and to not only distract the new scandal
from the president, but also make him out to be a hero.  For a war, you
need a small motive, some news coverage, a song(s), catch phrases, and a
hero left behind.  And not only do these liars need to convince the
American people, but also the other branches of government.
The story, however, does sound a bit gimmicky.  It could be just a bunch
of lies about one thing, and the story goes absolutely nowhere.  But the
story is always moving, with lots of wacky problems thrown the way of
our "heroes."  The story is smart, and that's why we have an encounter
with some CIA men (led by William H. Macy), a huge twist in mid-story
which would defeat most spin doctors, and even a hilarious problem
towards the end, which actually ends up helping them out more.
The script is hysterical, no shock since it's co-written by David Mamet
(a god among playwrights).  He has always been a connosieur of writing
great dialogue, and here is no exception.  In fact, he writes more great
one-liners and zingers than you can shake a stick at.  Every line is
intelligently written, and sounds exactly like something the respective
character would say...something that is often taken advantage of in
modern films.  I hope he and Hilary Menken, the other co-writer get
nominated.  
And the acting is brilliant.  DeNiro, who can play virtually any role,
is amazing as the schming Conrad who is payed to lie through other
people's teeth.  He has so much energy in his performance, and he's
brilliant with others (this might actually be his best performance in
the, like, thousand films he's in that are being released around now). 
Hoffman pretty much steals the film though, and might get an Oscar
nomination out of this.  He also has a ton of energy, albeit of a
different kind, and when he goes off on rants of creativity, coming up
with slogans and various ideas, it's true magic (his catch phrase: "This
isn't a problem," which is used for any size of problem that befalls our
protagonists).  And Heche holds her own between the two deities, showing
she's a great actress, and has a knack for comedy (her scene with DeNiro
and Macy is hilarious).
In the supporting cast, Denis Leary is predicatbly hysterical as the Fad
King, a great liar/friend of Hoffman's, who shows up to come up with
lies for the story.  He and Hoffman have great chemistry in several
scenes.  Willie Nelson shows up as - you guessed it - a drunken hick
song writer, and is hilarious.  Child actor Kirsten Dunst ("Interview
with the Vampire") has a small role as an actress playing in the one
news clip they make of war in Albania, and is pretty funny, as is Macy,
who plays more of an intelligent man than the trailers hinted at (his
line "When the fit hits the sham, somebody's gonna have to stay after
school" hints at another wacko role from him).  And Woody Harrelson is
just ingenius as the "war hero" Sgt. William Schuman, who turns out to
be a little...off kilter.  And look for a cameo from Harland "Rocketman"
Williams.
Director Barry Levinson, who's not had a good film since "Bugsy," which
was years ago, causes things to move slowly at first, but to pick up
eventually into mad camp, all while remaining plausible.  Although there
are times when I would have preferred more wackiness (his use of
acoustic music at times is kind of distracting), but he has a knack for
comic direction, and even makes things seem a little bit
documentary-like with quick close-ups and what-not, giving this a feel
that it's what's really happening, not some war.  I was very scared that
the director of such "gems" like "Toys" and "Sleepers" (the former which
was pointless; the latter which bored me to tears), but then again, this
is the same director of such real gems as "Diner" and "Rainman."  Now I
respect him again.
But the real greatness of "Wag the Dog" is the overall feel.  I laughed
the whole way through the film, and in between the laughs, I thought
that if looked at another way, this could be serious as hell.  We laugh
at the absurdity of everything (not to mention some truly funny lines
that are funny no matter what), but the thing is this film is probably
not absurd in the slightest.  I have no doubt that the character of
Conrad Breens is based on a real spin doctor.  I'm completely sure that
somewhere in Hollywood is a Stanley Motss.  This film hits so close to
home that it kind of scared me, making me realize that a lot of what
I've heard about politics may be as fabricated as the lies these
characters make up.
After all, we only hear things through the news.  And the news only
hears things from other mediums.  Are the people who are controlling
what we see people we've never even heard of?  These are people who make
lies up but can never take credit for it or they will endanger the
morale of our country.  We never find out if everything this film says
is true (even a final joke may or may not be fabricated), and that's the
point.
Although there are some slight flaws in the film, "Wag the Dog" is one
of the funniest and most satirical films I've seen in decades.  Though
it does not have the extreme bite of Kubrick's "Dr. Strangelove" or the
lenghty discussion-making of Ashby's "Being There," it is still a film
that will go down in history as one of the most intelligent and
brilliant satires of all time.  Though that may not seem so now, it's
still one of the best of the year, as well as one of the funniest.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Marty Mapes
**1/2 (out of 4) WHY DOES A DOG WAG ITS TAIL? BECAUSE THE DOG IS SMARTER
THAN THE TAIL. IF THE TAIL WERE SMARTER, IT WOULD WAG THE DOG.
Thus opens Barry Levinson's sharp and cynical WAG THE DOG. 
The president of the United States has spent 3 minutes unsupervised in a
White House closet with a Campfire Girl, 11 days before the election.
His spin team has that much time to distract the public and keep the
Campfire scandal out of the headlines. 
Conrad Brean (Robert DeNiro), the chief spinner, decides that something
big is needed to distract the public for 11 full days. Something huge,
like a war. And if an event is not wagging the media, then one has to
use the media to wag the event. 
Rather than having the president declare war, Conrad has the president's
press secretary deny nonexistent rumors about a fictitious bomber. He
has the president's representatives apologize to the American People for
the secrecy demanded by national security. In short, he has the
president give the public something even more interesting than a
scandal: a secret. A secret so big that it's busting out at the seams. 
But Conrad's war has to be more than a few rumors if it is to last
eleven days. A good war has to have something memorable, something
catchy that people can support and remember, like the video footage of
the smart bombs in the gulf war, the five soldiers raising the flag at
Iwo Jima, or even "fifty-four forty or fight." So Conrad enlists movie
producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman) to provide him with some
visuals. In turn, Stanley enlists the aid of songwriter Johnny Green
(Willie Nelson) and a team of Hollywood's great creative thinkers. 
Once all the talent is lined up, the magic really starts to happen.
Songs are written, footage is staged, and rumors are leaked with all the
tight cohesion of reality. A soulful "We Are The World" anthem is
recorded with lyrics straight from the Declaration of Independence. A
video clip is manufactured of a young girl rescuing a kitten from bombs
and guns. All eyes and ears are on the president, but not because of his
whoopsie in the closet. The process appears to be working. 
Problems do arise, and they usually seem insurmountable. But after we
get to know Conrad and Stanley, nothing seems insurmountable. Each new
problem is met with optimism ("This is not a problem! This is nothing!")
and creativity. When the opposing candidate plays his own ace, Stanley
and Conrad trump him with a wild card. When the CIA has them in check,
Conrad convinces them they're playing the same color. In fact, Conrad
admits that he'd be a good chess player if he could only remember how
all the pieces are SUPPOSED to move. 
Stanley and Conrad are a lot of fun to watch. Both characters are
clearly on top of the situation at all times, and both are masters of
quick thinking. Each new obstacle makes you smile because you want to
see how they'll think their way around it. DeNiro and Hoffman both give
top-notch performances to these smart and invigorating characters. 
But the movie is not all good. Some of the problems are forgivable
little annoyances, like the misleading ease with which the team creates
video effects, or the dragging as the story nears the end. But there is
one real problem that affects the whole movie, and it is the ending. 
IF YOU DON'T WANT TO KNOW THE ENDING, THEN STOP READING HERE.
In music, a "picardy third" is a major chord played at the end of a song
in a minor key. There is no opposite to a picardy third; it just doesn't
work to put a minor chord at the end of a major song. The same appears
to be true of movies. An audience will always go for an artificially
sweetened ending, but an unhappy ending on a comedy, even a sharply
cynical black comedy, is downright abusive.
WAG THE DOG plays as a black comedy right up to the end. The tone
undergoes a sudden and grave shift when we learn of the "heart attack"
of one of the movie's good guys. On top of that, it appears that a real
war is going to start in Albania. Wacky "Albania," that country with the
funny name, becomes the real Albania, a country in economic ruin that
can't afford any more trouble. 
The change seems deliberate, as if Levinson were trying to impart a
moral, but it doesn't work and it isn't necessary. The change is too
sudden and too drastic for it to be effective, and the movie is so full
of cynicism that its message was never in question. 
I imagine I'm overreacting to the ending. Most reviews I've read have
called WAG THE DOG a great movie, and for the most part, I agree. But
the tone of the last few minutes really made me feel jerked around. My
last response to the movie was confusion and annoyance. 
Then again, maybe that was Levinson's intent.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Kevin Patterson
I'm not quite sure how best to go about writing this review. I must admit that
I was a little disappointed by Barry Levinson's political satire "Wag The
Dog," but in retrospect, this has less to do with the film itself than with
false expectations I had going into it. Quite a few of the reviews I have read
led me to believe that this film was absolutely hilarious and would make me
laugh out loud the whole way through, and it didn't do that. They also led me
to believe that it would deliver a vicious and all-too-true attack on the way
the American political media works, and it didn't quite do that either. A few
of them even suggested that it would prove a worthy successor to Stanley
Kubrick's "Dr. Strangelove" in the tradition of political black comedy, and it
most definitely didn't do that. 
That said, "Wag The Dog" is actually a very clever satire on the shady
manipulations of political figures and those who assist them. The story
revolves around the attempts of political spin doctor Conread Brean (Robert
DeNiro) to distract the American public from the accusations that the
President, who is up for re-election in two weeks, sexually harassed a young
girl in the Oval Office. The accusations, the script suggests, are probably
untrue, but as Brean so pointedly puts it, that isn't particularly relevant:
the scandal is likely to derail the President's campaign regardless of its
truth or falsehood. Brean, along with his assistant (Anne Heche), decide to
contact Hollywood producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman) to enlist his help
in concocting enough propaganda and special-effects trickery to make it appear
that the U.S. is going to war with Albanian terrorists and thus propel the
President to victory on a wave of patriotic fervor. 
As I said, "Wag The Dog" is not quite as laugh-out-loud hilarious as I had
expected, but there are some genuinely funny moments to be found here, such as
when, in an echo of a familiar movie cliché, the camera pans out over an urban
sunset to the strains of uplifting, inspirational music, then cuts to a studio
to reveal that the singing is coming from a group of musicians whom Motss has
assembled to perform "We Have The Right To Fight For Democracy." Another scene
shows us how, with modern editing equipment, an actress running across a sound
stage with a bag of potato chips can be turned into a frightened young girl
and her kitten fleeing a terrorist attack on her village. The most
consistently effective gag revolves around the propaganda team's attempt to
forge a fictional war hero out of Sgt. William "Old Shoe" Schumann (Woody
Harrelson), an ex-military officer who turns out to be a first-class psycho. 
Of course, not everything goes as planned; the CIA, for example, realizes
what's going on and strikes a deal with the President's electoral opponent to
report to the media that the "fighting" has ended, forcing Motss and Brean to
come up with a new angle on the supposed Albanian crisis. Still, even with the
CIA's involvement, the film falls a little short in terms of making this
scenario believable. Regardless of the official word from the President or the
CIA, wouldn't the major media outlets have Eastern European correspondents who
could verify that there is, in fact, no fighting going on in Albania? The film
never addresses this question, nor does it show the reactions of the American
public to the news of the apparent war except for a few scenes which border on
the farcical, such as when basketball fans litter the court with shoes in
support of the aforementioned Sgt. Schumann; we are apparently meant to assume
that everyone is buying it. There was also an instance, towards the end of the
film, in which one of Motss's forced reinventions of the story seems to
contradict what he and Brean had been selling to the public thus far and could
conceivably have given the game away. 
With these plot holes, "Wag The Dog" doesn't quite work as a satire of
American politics, but it does send up the mentality that might lead to these
kinds of machinations in the first place. Brean and his advisors never seem
concerned that what they are doing is unethical; rather, they worry about how
convincing it will be and whether or not they have enough money to pull it
off. The film takes a decidely dark turn towards the end, as we learn how far
they are willing to go in order to keep the propaganda campaign a secret.
Motss and his Hollywood buddies, meanwhile, seem completely out of touch with
the rest of the world and just see this undertaking as another creative
project. In fact, one of the sources of conflict in the film is Motss's
increasing restlessness with the idea of not being able to take credit for
producing the fake war; in his mind, it is the greatest work of art he has
ever created. 
I think it's fair to say that "Wag The Dog" underachieves a little bit: more
attention to the public reaction and tighter plotting might have made this
into a four-star film and a classic satire. Still, the issue of an American
President using war and patriotism to distract from scandals or domestic
unpopularity is a very real one. Wag The Dog takes the issue one step further
and asks, what if the war wasn't even real? With this premise and the talented
cast, the film still delivers more consistently than most, whatever its flaws. 

Author
Christian Pyle
WAG THE DOG is a sharp satire on the manipulation of public opinion through the
creation of "news."  Like DR. STRANGELOVE (1964), WAG will likely be referenced
by political commentators for decades to come.  
Conrad Brean (Robert DeNiro), a professional problem solver, has been called in
by the White House to defuse a scandal-the President, nearing reelection, has
been accused of molesting a teenager.  Brean and White House staffer Winifred
Ames (Anne Heche) enlist movie producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman) to
create "a pageant"-a nonexistent war with Albania-to distract the media and the
public from the sex scandal.  Motss enthusiastically plots the storyline of the
war and deftly keeps the story going as unexpected events block their plans.  
One of WAG's points is that the experience of war for those not actually
fighting it is a collage of stirring images, patriotic songs, and memorials for
heroes.  Therefore, Brean and Motss give America a clip of an Albanian waif
(actually an actress played by Kirsten Dunst) fleeing explosions, numerous
songs, and a heroic soldier (Woody Harrelson) captured by the enemy.  The war
must have happened because, as Brean says several times, "I saw it on TV."
WAG's most obvious target is the use of military action as a political
smokescreen.  When the movie was released, many called it prophetic because,
around the same time, Clinton bombed Iraq in an obvious attempt to divert
attention from his own sex scandal.  However, Hilary Henkin and David Mamet's
screenplay drops references to Reagan and Bush's use of the same tactic.  In
many ways, WAG presents a better world-their war is bloodless.
Another satire, Michael Moore's CANADIAN BACON (1994), explores similar
territory.  In that film, the White House creates a state of tension between
the U.S. and Canada to replace the Cold War.  The message is the same:  having
a common enemy stirs up and unites the populace, and the power to manipulate
that effect has numerous political applications.  WAG is the better film; where
BACON descended into border-crossing hijinks and was weighed down by Moore's
use of its script as a soapbox, WAG is wonderfully subtle and rich in satiric
detail.
The relevance of WAG extends far beyond its parallels with recent history. 
Daniel Boorstin coined the term "pseudo-event" to describe an event which is
planned "for the immediate purpose of being reported."  With today's
technology, WAG THE DOG tells us, the pseudo-events can be more pseudo than
events.  Brean convinces Motss that the fake war can work by claiming that the
most famous image of the Gulf War was filmed on a sound stage with a small
model made of Legos.  Seeing may be believing, but can we believe what we see? 
As we are swept downstream in the constant rush of mass media, can we separate
the genuine from the artificial?  And, if documentary evidence is suspect, what
is history?  Brean adds a blues song to the 1930's by planting an album in the
Library of Congress.  Even history is suspect.

Author
Chad Polenz
1997, R, 95 minutes [1 hour, 35 minutes]
starring: Dustin Hoffman (Stanley Motss), Robert De Niro (Conrad Brean), Anne
Heche (Winifred Ames), Denis Leary (Fad King), written by Hilary Henkin, David
Mamet; produced by Robert De Niro, Barry Levinson, Jane Rosenthal; directed by
Barry Levinson; based on the novel "American Hero" by Larry Beinhart.
        Satirical films usually fall into one of two categories: 1) long-term satire
where everything, including the jokes, is somehow related on a large scale
(i.e. "Dr. Strangelove"; 2) situation satire in which the comedy and themes
are derived moment by moment and scene by scene (i.e. "Men In Black"). What's
unique about "Wag The Dog" is that it doesn't necessarily fit either of these
descriptions, and yet is both at the same time. The result is a clever comedy
based on an original, smart premise, even if the focus does tend to wander a
bit.
        If there's anything that affects Americans the most it's politics and
showbusiness. In this age of information and technology, we've been so
conditioned by the media and the entertainment industry in our ways of
perceiving things, it's gotten to the point that we are practically controlled
by it. We need the media to bring us the most up-to-date news, but we also
need the escapism of Hollywood to counter all that thinking. This film starts
off well by quickly establishing these ideas, and then presents an interesting
scenario: if politics, the media coverage of politics, and the entertainment
industry are so closely related, couldn't someone with the power and authority
to manipulate one of the aspects manipulate them all? That's the idea Conrad
Brean (De Niro), a professional Washington spin doctor, comes up with in order
to restore the president's good name who has been accused of child molestation
just weeks before the election.
        Brean, along with the president's top advisor, Winifred Ames (Heche), fly to
California to meet up with hot-shot movie producer Stanley Motss (Hoffman).
They pitch him an idea to "produce" the image of a war with Albania (it's a
country no one's heard of so they people will buy it). Soon the wheels are in
motion and the film's riffing satire comes into play. We're inundated with the
Hollywood mind set as Motss brings in a number of experts to help manage the
situation, such as a folk singer, visual and sound effects technicians, and a
modern style expert known as the Fad King (Leary). 
        The initial atmosphere is rich with numerous pop culture references where
everything somehow relates to something on TV, in the movies, or in the news.
The characters' dialogue is witty and funny, although some of the actual jokes
and gags seem rather sitcom-esque. For example, one scene shows Motss and
Brean's production crew filming an actress portraying a poor Albanian refugee.
Motss ordered a kitten for the girl to carry, but instead wound up with a
dozen different dogs. Since it's all computer-enhanced anyway, she ends up
cradling a bag of Tostitos with the kitten to be inserted later. This
demonstrates the film's ability to take a relatively ordinary situation and
make it smart and funny just through the premise. But then there's the gags
and one-liners that, although are humorous, seem a little gratuitious in the
long run such as Motss not being able to remember the actress's name, or,
whenever a problem emerges, always responding with,"This is nothing!"
        By the time the film makes it to the midpoint, everything that is going to
happen in terms of plot happens. The first act is quickly paced, while the
second act contains most of the jokes and is the core of the film. Every ten
minutes or so a new problem crops up that Motss and Brean must deal with, and
it's always fascinating to see what they do and how they do it. The screenplay
provides good characterization and actually deals with most of the problems
head-on in realistic manners. However, it does have a tendency to avoid things
and shift its focus from the election campaign and false war smokescreen to
something a bit off the subject.                 
        As the third act rolls around the satirical nature becomes more concerned
with the situations and less so with the big picture. What had started off as
a brilliant, somewhat harmless conspiracy to fool the general public begins to
seem more like something that would happen in a movie. Still, the situation
comedy is quite funny, especially a montage showing the entire country
flinging old shoes into trees to honor Sgt. Willie Schumann - a war hero Motss
and Brean concocted.
        Truly great satire manages to create for an entertaining story that makes you
laugh at the time, but think about afterwards and "Wag The Dog" at least
succeeds in this respect. However, in retrospect it seems like so much more
could have been done, namely by extending the running time and filling in the
plot holes. Then again, it's a valiant effort.
Please visit Chad'z Movie Page @ http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz - over 180
new and old films reviewed in depth, not just blind ratings and quick
capsules. Also, check out The FIRST Shay Astar Web Page @
http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz/ShayAstar.html

Author
Scott Renshaw
WAG THE DOG
(New Line)
Starring:  Robert DeNiro, Dustin Hoffman, Anne Heche, Denis Leary, Andrea
Martin, Craig T. Nelson, Woody Harrelson.
Screenplay:  Hilary Henkin and David Mamet, based on the novel "American
Hero" by Larry Beinhart.
Producers:  Jane Rosenthal, Barry Levinson and Robert DeNiro.
Director:  Barry Levinson.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Here's how I know I'm watching a truly brilliant piece of
socio-political satire:  even as I'm laughing, I'm not sure whether I
shouldn't actually be cringing in fear for my country.  DR. STRANGELOVE
inspired that kind of reaction, as did NETWORK and moments in M*A*S*H and
BEING THERE.  There have been several attempts in recent years to capture
the insanity of government by media mandate -- Tim Robbin's BOB ROBERTS,
Robert Altman's HBO series "Tanner '88", Michael Moore's CANADIAN BACON --
but none has come close to reaching the savage heights of WAG THE DOG.
Working with a magnificent script by Hilary Henkin and David Mamet,
director Barry Levinson creates the kind of film which leaves you
teary-eyed from laughter and slack-jawed in astonishment at its dark
audacity.
     The premise of WAG THE DOG feels torn from today's scandal-filled
headlines.  The American President (whose face is never actually shown),
facing a re-election vote in a matter of weeks, is hit with accusations
that he molested a young girl.  Instantly, the spin machine goes into
motion, as Presidential advisor Winifred Ames (Anne Heche) brings in
political fixer Conrad Breen (Robert DeNiro).  Breen knows that
President's only chance is a distracted electorate, so he decides to
manufacture an even bigger story than the allegations:  a war with
Albania, for reasons to be determined later.  The job of creating public
perception is handed to Hollywood producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman),
who forms a team to generate every necessary image and emotion.  Thus
begins a countdown to election day, with the only goal to keep the
American people looking the other way.
     WAG THE DOG rolls out the hilarious situations with such punishing
frequency that it's virtually impossible to select highlights.  The "We
Are the World"-style anthem created by the team's composer (Willie Nelson)
drips with pop-bombast jingoism; a studio shoot of an actress (Kirsten
Dunst) playing the part of an Albanian refugee turns a piece of fiction
into an icon; a commercial by the President's opponent (Craig T. Nelson)
makes use of Maurice Chevalier's "Thank Heaven for Little Girls" to jab
the President's scandals.  Some of the most subtle but scathing barbs
target the media, who lap up the images provided by the President's people
far too readily, riding the wave rather than bucking the tide.  Like all
the finest satire, WAG THE DOG is just absurd enough to be hilarious, and
just plausible enough to be alarming.
     The truly impressive thing about Henkin and Mamet's script is that it
finds time amid all the comic pot-shots to create a genuinely fascinating
character in Stanley Motss.  A well-tanned big shot modeled after
no-one-in-particular (Robert Evans?  Don Simpson?), Motss dives into his
assignment with show biz gusto and bluster, regaling all around him with
war stories of previous productions and a dismissive "This is nothing" to
accompany every crisis.  Hoffman plays Motss as an insecure mogul
determined to achieve the recognition he feels has been unfairly denied
him, even though Breen continues to insist that this particular story can
never become one of his war stories.  It's easily Hoffman's best
performance in over a decade:  sly, funny, angry, self-absorbed,
infuriating and absolutely delightful.
     Though WAG THE DOG focuses almost entirely on the actions of the
President's shadow cabinet, it's not exactly an indictment of political
dirty tricks.  If anything, the real villains in WAG THE DOG are the
American people -- not just for accepting the phony war, but for making it
necessary in the first place.  The script strongly suggests that the
accusations made against the President are false, but the facts of the
matter are instantly irrelevant.  An accusation of wrong-doing becomes the
same as wrong-doing in the popular consciousness, making the manipulations
of the President's team as ironic as they are necessary:  the only way
they can battle a lie is to create a bigger lie.  WAG THE DOG is a
dazzling, thought-provoking entertainment which alternately tickles you
and slaps you in the face, providing a warning that it's easy to keep
making fools out of us if we keep making it so easy.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Step aside Stanley Kubrick, Barry Levinson has just released two films
within six months of each another, while you're still out filming your
first movie in over ten years! Then again, Levinson's two films don't
exactly mount a challenge to any of your classic tales (DR.
STRANGLELOVE (7/10) being the first to spring to mind here), but hey,
at least he's working hard, right? SPHERE (6.5/10) was Levinson's other
film released in early 1998, while WAG THE DOG came out in late 1997.
PLOT:
The President of the United States is alleged to have had a sexual
encounter with a firefly girl while in office. To divert the country's
attention from this politically fatal bit of information, the
President's spin staff go all out on creating true-to-life scenarios of
more important and relevant news to the country. A Hollywood producer
is brought in to orchestrate the diverting hoaxes, and maintain the
President's approval ratings until the re-election vote in eleven days
time.
CRITIQUE:
One-joke political talking heads film does not generate enough humour
or excitement for me to appreciate the overall strong efforts put forth
by all of its actors and director. This movie is basically based on one
idea of pulling the wool over the country's eyes and not much else. And
as much as this concept intrigued me during its first ten to fifteen
minutes, the repetitive nature of the film's progression, just dragged
any enthusiasm and interest completely out of my system. There are only
so many scenes of people gathered in a small boardroom, and folks
chatting things up through their cellulars that I could take before
hungering out for something with a little more entertainment value.
Also, despite the film being classified as a political satire (I'll be
the first to admit that political films are not my favourite types of
film), I found very little humour in this script, despite a few moments
of cheeky cleverness. I'm sure that many people in the Hollywood and
Washington inner-circles would appreciate many of the witty lines from
this movie, but for me, it all seemed like a lot of talking by the same
group of people about the interrelated ideas over and over and over
again. Having said all that, the film did run a quick 90 minutes or so,
did have a decent score, and did offer some unique directing ticks by
Levinson, and solid performances by all involved.
Dustin Hoffman, Robert DeNiro and Anne Heche all pull off dead-on
portrayals of sneaks in the business world of show and politics. But
despite their valiant efforts and high credibility factors, I did find
myself rolling my eyes during many of the films scenarios of deception,
and questioning their relatively ease of unfolding. And while the film
does moniker itself a satire, I felt that too many of its media-fueled
fantasies just made the entire American population and media appear to
be a bunch of complete ignoramuses with not much more on their mind
than TV and sensationalism. Not sure how factual that statement may be
to true life, but I guess I would've preferred a stronger offensive
from the plethora of cynics roaming today's societal potpourri. All in
all, I could picture this film endearing itself to all those fans of
political fare, but gaining very little excitement from the rest of the
American Joes of whom this film pokes fun. I personally liked its
conclusion and acting performances, but found much of the rest of the
film to be dry, repetitive and unfunny.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Keep your eyes peeled for Robert DeNiro's real-life daughter playing
the gate stewardess at the airport in this film. Her name is Drena
DeNiro. Mr. DeNiro was also a producer on this film.
After this film started production and before its release, US President
Bill Clinton became involved in a sex scandal with former White House
intern Monica Lewinsky, and threatened military action against Iraq.
Barry Levinson apparently took only 30 days of filming to complete this
film.
This film constitutes Robert DeNiro's fourth partnership with a David
Mamet-based screenplay. The three others were the ill-fated WE'RE NO
ANGELS, THE UNTOUCHABLES (7.5/10) and most recently, RONIN (7.5/10).
William H. Macy once studied under writer David Mamet at Goddard
College in Vermont. The "H" in his name stands for Hall.
Anne Heche dated fellow actor Steve Martin for two years, before
switching sexual gears and becoming Ellen DeGeneres' partner in 1997.
Plenty of cameos pepper this small-budgeted production ($15million)
including Woody Harrelson, Jim Belushi, Jay Leno, William H. Macy
(Delivering one of the films best lines, "When the fit hits the shan,
someone's going to have to stay after school,"), Craig T. Nelson,
Willie Nelson and Kirsten Dunst.
Woody Harrelson graduated from Hanover College in 1983. He also played
the character "Woody" from Hanover on the super-popular TV sitcom
"Cheers".
Kirsten Dunst beat out Christina Ricci for roles in INTERVIEW WITH THE
VAMPIRE (8/10) and LITTLE WOMEN.
The original music for this film was scored by Mark Knoffler, member of
the famed "Dire Straits" musical group.

Author
Walter Frith
In order to make true movie satire work, you have to keep the running
time relatively short and the target of your subject matter should be
something or someone that movie audiences despise.  1964's 'Dr
Strangelove' which elevated director Stanley Kubrick's career and showed
technology running amok and the eventual dehumanization of 'the system'
for which Kubrick became famous, was an important first step in the
intellectual progression of movie making which allowed its
creators to become more daring with every attempt.
When I first saw screenwriter Paddy Chayefsky's 'Network', made in 1976,
a scathing satire and indictment of the television industry, I was
completely taken with its message of powerful corporate types engaged in
an illegal lust for power by doing whatever was necessary to keep their
television company on top of the world, including killing a former news
anchorman turned tabloid prophet because he had low ratings.  I never
thought I would see such a film again and I still haven't but 'Wag the
Dog' is the best satire I've seen since the two movies mentioned above
were made.
'Wag the Dog' hides nothing from the audience in showing political
advisers counting on the major population's lack of attention span and
virtually insulting the average person's intelligence in diverting the
facts away from the real issues of presidential misconduct.  The current
president is accused of having sex with a teen aged girl who belongs to
an organization similar to the girl scouts and the election is less than
two weeks away.  The president's opponents get wind of the story and use
This movie showcases the theory that asks: "If a tree falls in the
forest and no one is around to hear it, does it make a sound"?  You'll
find this to be true as the film dives right in in the opening ten
minutes and shows the president's top advisers meeting with a political
spin doctor (Robert De Niro) who is an expert at drawing the public's
attention away from the facts by using the media.  It's a meeting that
takes place deep within the farthest basement of the White House and
although the public never sees these meetings, we know they take place.
'Network' used the medium of television and accomplished the task of
increasing public cynicism for the greater good of shaking up 'the
system' and now 'Wag the Dog' does the same in a different story.
To truly accomplish the mission, De Niro and a top aid to the president
(Anne Heche), travel to Los Angeles to seek the help of a top Hollywood
producer (Dustin Hoffman) to succeed in their task.  After explaining
the situation, Hoffman is both shocked and somewhat fascinated with the
prospect of engaging in a deliciously tempting project, seduced by the
fraudulent aspects of it and the challenge of creating a fraud and if
the public buys it, Hoffman knows it will be the best work of his career
even though he can't ever tell anybody about it.
Hoffman's portrayal of this magnificent character is one of brash vanity
combined with a slightly eccentric twist of personality.  De Niro is
somewhat sedated in his role but it is clear that his character is one
of a low profile so audiences shouldn't mistake it as a slacking
performance, just one suitable to the movie's plot.
Based on the book 'American Hero' by Larry Beinhart, Hilary Henkin and
David Mamet's script has a back up plan, a plan 'b' if you will, that
takes shape in light of the partially failed attempt by the movie's
characters to totally carry out the plan outlined in the basic plot.  It
moves to create a false sense of hope and patriotism among the public
that makes the presidential scandal at hand mild and innocuous.
Barry Levinson's light handed direction and crafty decision to make the
screenplay the picture's real star are balanced with the cast's
willingness to do the same and at a running time of 96 minutes, 'Wag the
Dog' has a conclusion which enforces its basic theme and message of
deception while never losing sight of the fact that it's a comedy!
Visit 'FILM FOLLOW-UP' by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Brian Koller
"Wag the Dog" is a biting satire of U.S. Presidential 
politics.  It has been compared to "Dr. Strangelove", and
indeed it is similar in feel: both films mine for
humor by demonstrating how ludicrous seemingly ordinary
events and conversations can become, when the participants 
have lost their perspective of what they are doing.
But "Wag the Dog" is no "Dr. Strangelove".  It is too
talky, too self-satisfied, too cynical, and often annoying
in its excessive (and needless) use of obscenity.  While
there is a grain of truth in this tale of spin doctors
replacing reality with phony and manipulating images,
the notion is remarkably condescending that the media 
and the public would follow like sheep in whatever direction
they are led.
The plot has the President getting into an unrecoverable
scandal two weeks before re-election.  He has had perhaps
non-consensual sex with an underage girl, and this is the 
subject of many sly jokes (as if it could actually be funny).  
Robert De Niro plays a Presidential aide who wants the U.S. 
to start a war  with Albania to take the focus from the President's 
shenanigans.  He enlists Hollywood producer Dustin Hoffman,
idea man Denis Leary, and songwriter Willie Nelson to
fabricate this war and its images.  Things get even more
preposterous as a soldier chosen randomly to be a war hero
turns out to be a psychotic nun-raper (This is also supposed
to be funny: Does Hollywood believe that rape is a subject
for comedy?)
Sometimes the black comedy does find its target.  Willie Nelson
conducts a group of singers slogging their phony way through
a manipulative song, and the satire catches it perfectly.
Also effective are political ads with the lame slogan 
"Don't change horses in mid-stream" that appear endlessly 
on TV monitors.  But while it is good to see the taboo against
parodying U.S. patriotism broken, the joke of tossing old
shoes in support of servicemen is a groaner.
On the whole, this film is a major disappointment.
The depiction of a presidential administration that is essentially 
controlled by spin artists creating fantasy events for 
short term media payoffs, swallowed whole by the media and
a public that completely ignores substance for spectacle,
is smug and shallow and (worst of all) not often funny.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Author
Jerry Saravia
In light of the recent events involving President Clinton and Paula Jones, not
to mention the recent reports of the reemergence of Saddam Hussein, "Wag the
Dog" is as perceptive and realistic a satire as I have ever seen; a dark,
edgily written treatise on politics, Hollywood and the media, and how they are
all interrelated. 
"Wag the Dog" starts with a momentous sex-scandal involving the President of
the United States - he apparently had a sexual encounter with an underage Girl
Scout in the Oval Office. Naturally, the nation is on its toes with this
scandal that threatens the upcoming election. Facing a desperate hour, the
White House enlists a spin-control doctor, Conrad Bean (Robert De Niro), to
divert the nation's attention by inventing a war with Albania! To do this,
Conrad gets assistance from a disbelieving presidential aide (Anne Heche), and
a veteran Hollywood producer named Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman) - together,
they have to create the appearance of a war by utilizing the power of the mass
media. Motss orchestrates the production by creating a stage where a young girl
(Kirsten Dunst) is supposedly running along the barracks of Albania carrying a
kitten. "Get me a calico kitten," shouts Motss, admitting he's never had this
much fun on a production before. Through a two-day process of computer
animation, some "Anne Frank sirens," and a hand-held camera, a fake war is
unveiled before the public's eyes. As Motss makes clear, "This is nothing. This
is a walk in the park. Have you ever shot in Italy? " 
And this is just the beginning. The catch is that for every deceptive
performance they pull, the principals have to promise to never tell anyone, or
they will be killed. The ambitious Motss wants some credit for his work,
though: "The producer never gets any credit. How can you have a movie without a
producer?" Even the young "Albanian" girl can't mention her performance on her
resume - "It's just a pageant," declares Conrad. 
"Wag the Dog" is based on the book "American Hero," a fictional chronicle of
George Bush's attempts to create an unwanted war in the Persian Gulf. Is the
movie outrageous and exaggerated, or is it speaking the truth? Considering the
recent events surrounding Clinton's presidency, the movie is so truthful and
acidly written, it is bitingly scary and sad to watch. The movie is basically
saying that the media reports lies, not truths. Of course, we have seen dozens
of movies that showed the corrupt amorality at the core of politics and the
media - we see it every day, from the nightly news intent on reporting bloody
crimes, to "The Jerry Springer Show" that advertises more and more fist fights,
to the absurd overexposure of the Paula Jones case. What "Wag the Dog" does
differently is to show how far politicians and the press are willing to go to
sell their "product," basically yellow journalism, to the American public. The
public will believe anything the media reports to them, so if there's a war
going on with Albania, by golly, they'll buy it. Anything will work as long as
it distracts attention from the President's sexual dalliances. In one of
several attempts to prove their credibility, they concoct an old blues record
called "Old Shoe," which becomes the nickname for a long-lost war hero (Woody
Harrelson) who is actually a psychotic prisoner!
The wonderful cast is first-rate. Dustin Hoffman is excellent as the showy,
nervous, fast-talking producer Motss who recalls the equally pretentious
producer Robert Evans - it is a performance that ranks with Hoffman's best work
in "Midnight Cowboy" and "Rain Man." Robert De Niro brings a smoothness and
calmness that I've not seen him do since "Stanley and Iris"; note the calm
precision by which he utters lines such as, "I'm working on it," or "We'll have
to kill you" with a smile. Watching De Niro and Hoffman perform together is as
pleasurable an experience as I've had in all of 1997. Anne Heche has a less
remarkable role as the presidential aide, but she holds her own with these two
heavyweights, especially during the conference scenes. Kudos must also go to
Woody Harrelson's explosive cameo as the dumb, naive rapist with rotten teeth
who pretends to be a war hero from Albania. It is equally delightful to see
other memorable supporting roles including Willie Nelson as a singer trying to
come up with a theme song for Albania; Denis Leary who is great fun as a slogan
specialist; and there's William H. Macy (a Mamet regular) as an FBI agent who's
curious about the credibility of this war. 
"Wag the Dog" is as incisive and tragic a commentary on the amorality and lack
of values in today's media frenzy as Network was. A brilliant script by David
Mamet and Hillary Henkin, superb direction by Barry Levinson, typically
"contrasty" cinematography by Robert Richardson, and expert performances by a
game cast make for one of 1997's finest films. It's unforgettable, saddening,
hilarious, and honest about the manipulation of the media, and how they report
the news as if it was entertaining fodder for the dumb and dumber set. This is
not a film to be ignored. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 By Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 New Line Cinema
 Director:  Barry Levinson
 Writer:  Hilary Henkin and David Mamet
 Cast: Robert DeNiro, Dustin Hoffman, Anne Heche, Denis
Leary, Willie Nelson, Andrea Martin, Kirsten Dunst, William H.
Macy, Craig T. Nelson, Suzie Plakson
   The U.S. Constitution is a flawed document.  Made up by
fellows of landed wealth, it nevertheless forbids the country
from enjoying a monarchy. Now, the British king or queen
serves quite a useful function in that society.  The monarch
provides the people with the drama we all seek while allowing
those with true power to carry on the routines of governing. 
In the U.S., by contrast, the people depend on their politicians
for their theatrical thrills, an addiction which leads to months
of long, silly campaigning for high offices like the presidency. 
The scandal-hungry public, unable to grant titular
leaders the permission to humiliate themselves, instead
depend on presidential mortification.  
   In "Wag the Dog," Barry Levinson does an unusually quiet,
though articulate, take on what a president must do during the
closing days of his campaign to get re-elected when a
scandal threatens to oust him from office.  Hilary Henkin and
David Mamet, who wrote the script, do not tell us anything we
don't know about the corrupt bargains needed by higher-ups
(in business as well as politics).  But allowing clever dialogue
to come across to the audience as routine, matter-of-fact
conversation, they have allowed their actors to expose
political shams as nothing more than acts and deeds that go
with the territory.  Though "Wag the Dog" lacks the crisp,
repetitive talk that we usually expect from writers like Mamet,
the movie compensates by uncovering the corruption that
power engenders as though it were merely a feature of
performance artistry.  In other words, the value of
the film is that it presents sensational events as though they
were expected, everyday occurrences.
   The drama is inspired by an incident which befalls the
incumbent president during the conclusion of his re-election
campaign.  A teenage girl accuses the chief executive of
sexual harassment which allegedly took place just beyond the
prying eyes of the Oval Office, leading comedian Jay Leno to
quip, "When the president presses the flesh, he's not
campaigning: he's dating."  The senator who is running for the
high office exploits the situation by using the song "Thank
heaven for little girls" to put across his point that "we have to
change the tune."  The incident threatens the tenure of the
chief executive. What to do?  The campaign hires a spin
doctor, Conrad Brean (Robert De Niro), also known as "Mr.
Fixit," to devise a way to whitewash the event.  What better
way to distract the electorate than by going to war?  No need
to have any actual fighting: just produce a skirmish in much
the way that Hollywood would create a movie and convince
the public that a heroic conflict is actually occurring.  Brean
hires a Hollywood producer, Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman)
who--with the help of a song writer (Willie Nelson), a would-be
hero (Woody Harrelson) and an attractive presidential
assistant (Anne Heche)--invent a conflict involving a U.S.
anti-terrorist fighting mission in Albania.
   As a delightful contrivance, "Wag the Dog" recalls the
waggery of Leonard Wibberley's novel, "The Mouse That
Roared," which deals with a small country that declares war
against the U.S. fully expecting to lose and then be granted
huge doses of foreign aid by the victor.  In this case, the
world's greatest power allegedly sends B-3 bombers (which
the U.S. government denies even exists therefore leading the
public to conclude that it surely does) to little Albania.  To
excite the American people to the horrors committed in that
poor European nation, Motss hires a young woman (Kirsten
Dunst) to act out a skit in which she is running across her
Albanian village screaming that she has just been raped by
terrorists.  To keep the C.I.A. from revealing the hoax, Motss
and Brean explain to one of its members (William H. Macy)
that his very job depends on playing along with the game.
   Visually, "Wag the Dog" unfolds one event which provides
its audience with a display of technical virtuosity that will
amaze even the most jaded, teenage computer hacker. 
Asking the "terrorist victim" simply to run across the stage
with a large bag of potato chips in her hands, Motss and
Brean show how digitized photography can create astounding
imagery.  As the technician (Bernard Hocke) manipulates a
large machine, the bag of potato chips turns into a white
kitten which has been superimposed on the TV screen, and
the stage becomes a quaint European village in flames.
   The real virtue of the movie is the chemistry between De
Niro as spin doctor and Hoffman as Hollywood producer. 
While De Niro's character remains in the background,
Hoffman's is exuberant.  Baring vanity as mankind's favorite
sin--as Al Pacino informed us in his diabolical role in "Devil's
Advocate"--Hoffman stands out as a guy who does not want
for financial success but feels left out because "no one knows
what a producer does."  Having produced several Academy
Awards shows, he groans that he has never himself won an
Oscar, and is determined to put on a show during the
presidential campaign which is the creative high point of his
life.  Anne Heche, by contrast, is ill-defined by the script and
so heavily made up that she looks like a figure from the
collection of Madame Tussaud.  
   Deliberately scaled down to ponder the everyday nature of
corruption, "Wag the Dog" comes across as a modest, $15
million film shot in just under a month, an intriguing entry from
Barry Levinson which embraces his smaller movies like
"Diner" rather than more flamboyant ones like "Bugsy" and 
"Donnie Brasco" Rated R.  Running Time: 98 minutes.  (C)
1997  Harvey Karten

Author
Luke Buckmaster
After viewing Dustin Hoffman and Robert DiNiro tell a story that seems not to 
be far from the truth, you can't help but suspect that the public has not been 
told all there is to know about the Whitehouse's sexual allegations.  Just 
after Bill Clinton had been accused of not controlling the insides of his 
pants, a nuclear threat in Iraq emanated.  The prospect of war had begun, but 
thankfully nothing initiated from it.
An eerily similar situation is evident in Wag the Dog, a refreshingly amusing 
politically incorrect satire.  In essence the film is based around a "Spin 
Doctor" and Hollywood producer attempting to cover up the Prezy's keen 
"interest" in a young Girl Scout (2 weeks before the election).  In execution, 
Wag the Dog takes a bold look at how the media is "created;" even if that means 
degrading itself along the way.  Not that the film has much to degrade - acting 
is sharp and admirable, the no nonsense script is a clever parody of political 
affairs and it's characters are able to express their engaging opinions through 
the use of a slick dialogue.  
After the Presidents raunchy affairs, Conrad Brean (Robert DiNiro) and Winifred 
Ames (Anne Heche) work out a way to remove him from the media spotlight before 
the population can even consider voting differently on re-election.  Their plan 
is simple: cook up a war.  What, after all, do most people actually witness in 
regard to wars?  Perhaps photos in magazines, articles in newspapers and video 
clips on the TV.  If this weren't about politics, I'd swear it was about 
Hollywood.
Realizing this, Conrad and Winifred hire hot shot movie producer (Dustin 
Hoffman) to create a real life movie.  Realistic acting, special effects and 
surroundings are now more important than ever.
Surely, Wag the Dog has everything going for it.  It's funny.  It's engaging.  
It's studious.  It's all of those things once or twice.
Because Wag is an eminently repetitive film, for the more derogatory viewer 
funny can quickly become cruddy, engaging to enraging and studious to 
fastidious.  But for those who crave a solid high quality film, this is 
probably the best opportunity to view a profuse piece of consistent art that 
they'll get for a long time.  In short: if you like the opening scenes, you'll 
like the ending scenes. And if you like what's in between, you're set for a 
great time.
Director Barry Levinson (Disclosure, Donnie Brasco) successfully wags the film 
into following his precise cynicism of the globe's media.  Hoffman, DeNiro and 
Heche absorb the screen so well that we can't help but think they were meant to 
act together from the start.  Not only do they sound like presidential 
scammers; they also look like presidential scammers - and follow out to the 
exact degree what is required for almost perfect performances.  Wag the Dog's 
acting is far better than anything else it has to offer; and although the 
scripting is intelligently inventive it does get a tad boring when the same 
method is repeated from scene to scene.
Surely, Wag is a masterpiece that missed the mark.  


Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Robert De Niro, Dustin Hoffman, Anne Heche, Woody Harrelson, 
      Denis Leary, Andrea Martin, Willie Nelson, Suzie Plakson, 
      Kirsten Dunst, William H. Macy
Director: Barry Levinson
Producers: Robert De Niro, Barry Levinson, Jane Rosenthal
Screenplay: David Mamet & Hilary Henkin, based on the book by 
      Larry Beinhart
Cinematography: Robert Richardson
Music: Mark Knopfler
U.S. Distributor: New Line Cinema
     Hollywood and Presidential politics  perfect together.  Anyone who 
doubts this simple maxim will face a challenge to their opinion when 
they see WAG THE DOG, the hilarious new satire from director Barry 
Levinson.  For, although this film is one of the funniest comedies of 
the year, it also carries a serious, thought-provoking message about the 
relationship between politics and mass-market entertainment.  This is 
one of Levinson's best films, and the screenplay, co-penned by noted 
writer David Mamet (along with Hilary Henkin), is brilliantly on-target.  
     The premise is relatively simple.  Only two weeks before election 
day, a sitting president is hit by a sex scandal.  A brief dalliance 
with a Firefly Girl becomes public knowledge, and now his 17% lead is 
about to plummet.  Winifred Ames (Anne Heche), one of the President's 
top aides, calls in spin doctor extraordinary, Conrad Bream (Robert De 
Niro).  Conrad goes to work immediately, deciding that the best way to 
get the public's mind off the Firefly Girl is to give them something 
bigger to think about.  "Change the story, change the lead" is his 
motto, so he decides to manufacture a war against Albania.  Why Albania?  
Because the name sounds sinister and no one in the United States knows 
anything about the country.
     Conrad decides that he and Winifred can't do it alone.  They need 
help, so they go to big-time Hollywood producer Stanley Motss (Dustin 
Hoffman).  He has never won an Academy Award, but he's more than willing 
to help stage the war.  They'll need slogans, a theme song, 
merchandising links, and sympathetic characters.  Soon, carefully-
controlled leaks to the press make it to the evening news, and everyone 
is reporting about the outbreak of hostilities between the United States 
and Albania, even though no troops have been moved and no shots have 
been fired.  Actual battles don't matter, however, because, if it's on 
television, it must be real.
     The ones wagging the dog are clearly the spin doctors:  Conrad, 
Stanley, and Winifred.  But who is the dog?  The media, who eagerly lap 
up every drop of milk spilled by the White House press staff?  The 
American public, ever-eager for the latest made-for-television 
war/entertainment?  The answer is likely both.  And, while Levinson and 
Mamet are clearly stretching reality beyond the bounds of credibility 
for the purposes of this satire, there's more than a kernel of truth in 
the core theme.  Political campaigns are often run like Hollywood motion 
pictures.  Television is critical to a candidate's success.  And the 
media loves a good war  just look at the current frenzy that's 
occurring as hostilities with Iraq rise towards a crescendo.
     Levinson directs WAG THE DOG with a sure hand.  The director has a 
spotty resume  he has been responsible for winners like TIN MEN and 
RAIN MAN (also with Hoffman) and losers like TOYS.  This time around, 
he's in complete control of the material.  Meanwhile, Mamet has honed 
his pen to its sharpest to systematically slice apart targets ranging 
from television news reporting methods to the political process.  While 
doing so, he has come up with some innovative interpretations of various 
recent historical events.  For example, who recalls how soon after the 
Beirut disaster the United States "invaded" Grenada?
     The actors all play their roles with zeal.  De Niro, getting a 
chance to essay a character who's not a gangster or a heavy, is 
delightful, and it's easy to believe that Conrad is the best in the 
business.  If I needed a spin doctor, he'd be first on my list.  Hoffman 
matches him scene for scene as the sleazy-but-ambitious producer.  The 
actor almost never turns in a bad performance, but this is his best in 
several years, eclipsing what he did in Mamet's AMERICAN BUFFALO.  Anne 
Heche, who has been in the news for her personal life, is capable as the 
proverbial dumb blond.  Woody Harrelson is wonderfully thick doing his 
best Billy Bob Thornton impression.  Cameos include Kirsten Dunst as an 
actress hired to play an Albanian refugee, William H. Macy as CIA agent 
Young, and Craig T. Nelson as Senator John Neal, the President's 
challenger.  It is also worth noting that Levinson got around the tricky 
task of casting the President by never showing his face.  This is 
entirely appropriate, since everything we learn about the man is a 
shadowy, insubstantial fabrication.
     To avoid making WAG THE DOG sound too much like an intellectual 
challenge, let me make this clarification:  the movie is intelligent, 
but it's also a lot of fun.  This is the kind of film that you can laugh 
and think your way through.  I look forward to seeing WAG THE DOG 
another time, and I think I'll enjoy it as much, if not more.  No matter 
what your political persuasion is, or how cynically you regard the 
goings-on in Washington, you will be entertained.  Let's just hope WAG 
THE DOG isn't too close to the mark in its depiction of specific events.
Now with more than 1300 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"For me, the cinema is not a slice of life, but a piece of cake."

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Barry Levinson
Cast: Robert De Niro, Dustin Hoffman, Anne Heche, Woody Harrelson, Denis
Leary, Andrea Martin
Rated R: Language, adult themes
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Wag the Dog is one of the smartest, most self-aware pictures of the
year. There isn't a chance it misses with it's witty satire of the
government and the Hollywood process. Each character seems to be an
exaggerated stereotype, whether it be a film producer, CIA agent, or a
White House official. Directed by Barry Levinson with poker-faced
dryness, Wag the Dog is a film that should be studied by anyone
interested in making a satire.
    But I didn't like it. It has almost nothing that I love to see in
films. And I'm torn here, because I realize that this is the point. It
is a satire--and a good one at that--but without a likable character in
site, without a drop of real human emotion, without a speck of good
nature or good intentions, I found it hard to sit through this film
without squirming. In fact, I didn't. I squirmed a lot. Maybe I should
recommend it based on this--clearly the point of this film is not just
to make fun of the government, but to make the public a little bit
worried about what's going on behind the scenes. The simple fact is that
I just didn't enjoy it.
    Robert De Niro stars as Conrad Brean, a guy who works for the
president (his exact job title is never disclosed); his efforts in this
film all point to one ultimate objective--reelect the president. This,
of course, means faking a war in Albania with the help of big-time film
producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman). They stage ten seconds of video
footage with a little girl holding a kitten, running through a war-torn
village. They hire a songwriter (Willie Nelson) to make a happy theme
song. Later, they even create a man who allegedly was left behind in
Albania. His name is Schumann (Woody Harrelson), and he is psychotic.
The public refers to him affectionately as "Old Shoe," but of course
they don't realize that he's spent the last twelve years in a military
prison for raping a nun.
    I never thought I'd see a film that actually surpasses the
implications of the word "scathing." This film is beyond scathing.
"Acidic" doesn't even do it justice--this is like 200 molar acidic
(which is so concentrated that the word "acidic" no longer has meaning).
If you dropped a reel of Wag the Dog on the ground, it would burn
through the floor and eventually end up at the center of the earth.
    Okay, so I'm going a little overboard. I did think a lot of this
film was very funny. The whole business involving Schumann was great,
especially the resolution to the situation. Just the thought of faking a
war seems ludicrous to me, and after much thought, this aspect is also
outright funny. Much of the film is funny in that delayed-laughter sort
of way, where it takes some thought to realize how silly the situation
is, and then you are permitted to laugh. This film also takes some bold
chances, with a fairly subtle message about the American public that
isn't exactly positive.
    It's just that I found it . . . lifeless. Sure, the comedy is
energetic. The sheer effort that went into making such a serious jab at
the reelection process is definitely complete. But for the most part, I
found it to be lethargic. Scenes fumble from one moment to the next,
without having any real obvious objective. For example, as they were
composing the phony video footage, I couldn't even guess where the story
was going to go from there. It didn't seem to have motivation; the
Schumann element came out of nowhere.
    In addition, I find it hard, if not impossible, to enjoy a film when
I dislike all of the characters, no matter how satirical they're
supposed to be. Films that I consider satires (or at least black
comedies) always have at least one character with whom audiences can
identify--Brazil, for example, features a main character with whom we
can all empathize. I realize that Wag the Dog is an entirely different
kind of film, but I think that if either Conrad or Stanley had been a
little bit more down-to-earth, I could have found something in this film
that might make me care. De Niro plays Conrad so subtly two-faced that
he almost seems nice sometimes (until you realize that he's about to
have you executed). Hoffman, on the other hand, plays an individual so
wrapped up in himself that reality is long gone, and he's become a rich,
pathetic man barely worth a second look. Even the supporting characters
played competently by Anne Heche, Woody Harrelson, Denis Leary, and
Willie Nelson lack anything even remotely appealing.
    And so, I am put in a strange position. Should I recommend this film
based on the fact that it clearly does what it has set out to do? I
suppose that's what I'm doing. I, however, like to see something with a
glimpse of good-heartedness in it. Even films as entirely negative and
dreary as Seven don't feel this cynical. Wag the Dog has a uniquely
wretched mood, an ineffable level of skepticism guided right towards the
government and the American public that it's wagging. I fear that if
they had done what I suggest and create characters or situations that
elicit an emotional response, then it would have lost much of the
desired potency. I'm more inclined to believe that a film like this
simply can not satisfy my tastes.

Author
Steve Kong
Ever wonder what happens behind the scenes with Presidential spin control?
What happens when a President -- who's up for re-election in a few days --
does something really horrible? How do you deal with this problem? Confront
the problem head on? Attack the problem from the side? No, hire a spin
control artist and just make people forget about the problem all together.
The President in Wag the Dog has a 17% lead in the polls. But, he has done
something wrong. Something completely wrong that will send his 17% lead
down the toilet. What's he done? Did he kill someone? Did he steal
something? Political policy gone awry? No, think Girl Scout -- actually,
Firefly girl. Think young.
So, what's a top Presidential aide, Winifred Ames (Anne Henche), going to
do? Bring in the best spin doctor around, Conrad Bream (Robert De Niro).
Bream has an idea on how to control the situation -- just steer the
attention away from the Firefly girl for long enough to get the President
re-elected. And what better to get the attention of the American people
than a war? Bream contacts a Hollywood producer, Stanley Motss (Dustin
Hoffman), about producing a war. Motss likes the idea and is willing to
produce the war. And from here the US goes to war with Albania. And the
dirt hungry American people have forgotten about the Firefly girl and have
taken up with the war in Albania.
Wag the Dog is a hilarious satire about how close Hollywood and politics
really are. How Hollywood and politics really do hold hands together. But,
it goes a bit farther than that, Wag the Dog shows how Hollywood, politics,
and the media in general are holding hands with each other. This is an
intelligent film that has something for us to think about, but all the
while not burdening us too hard with it.
The actors in Wag the Dog seem to be having a great time. De Niro is
playing a part he usually doesn't get to play, and that is the part of
someone who is not out to break your face or kill you. De Niro gets to play
a brilliant and intelligent man who is out to help the President. And he
does a great job with this. Henche, coming off her awful performance in I
Know What You Did Last Summer, does a great job with her part as the
Presidential aide who is willing to do just about anything to get the
President re-elected. And Hoffman is just superb as Hollywood producer
Motss. Among these leads are many cameos throughout the film which are
absolutely hilarious to see. Among the cameos is Kirsten Dunst as an
Albanian girl in some news footage, Denis Leary as some sort of creative
guy, Willie Nelson as a musical guy, William H. Macy as a CIA guy, Craig T.
Nelson as the Presidential opponent, Woody Harrelson as a military guy, and
James Belushi as himself.
The script by Hilary Henkin and David Mamet is intelligent and funny. The
direction by Barry Levinson is steady. And worth mentioning is the
wonderful music by Mark Knopfler. The only nitpicking that I have about the
film is the spotty camera work. Most of the camera work is great with the
exception of a few shots which just feel wrong -- to be specific there are
some quick zooms that felt out of place.
Wag the Dog is definitely a Don't Miss Film. I found myself laughing out
loud, along with the audience, during most of the film. The performances
are great and the cameos are even better. And you'll want to see the film
to find out why dogs wag their tails.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Wag The Dog (1997)
Robert De Niro, Dustin Hoffman, Anne Heche, Woody Harrelson, Denis Leary, 
Andrea Martin, Willie Nelson, Suzie Plakson, Kirsten Dunst, William H. 
Macy, Craig T. Nelson. Directed by Barry Levinson. Rated R, 4 stars (out 
of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com/film/
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
In politics, image is absolutely everything. Early in "Wag The Dog," 
someone challenges a top-level Presidential spin doctor about truth and 
he snaps "The truth? I'll tell you about truth. I saw the first draft of 
the Warren Commission Report. It said Kennedy was killed by a drunk 
driver."
"Wag The Dog" is a hilarious black comedy about people so far removed 
from morals that questions of right or wrong never even enter their minds.
 Their only consideration is the effectiveness of their elaborate 
deceptions, and who gets a cut of the merchandising profits. Cynical? Of 
course, but Barry Levinson's crackerjack direction maintains such a giddy 
momentum that there's really no time to reflect on how awful these people 
are. Instead, you just sit back and enjoy their brazen scheming.
Here's the set-up. 11 days before the election, the incumbent President, 
who has enjoyed a 17% lead in the polls, is accused of hitting on an 
underage girl during a White House tour. Within hours, his challenger 
(Craig T. Nelson) has crafted devastating new TV ads, set to the tune of 
"Thank Heavens For Little Girls." Quickly, Presidential assistant 
Winifred Ames (Anne Heche) calls in damage control expert Conrad Brean 
(Robert De Niro,) who reasons that the only way for the President to be 
re-elected is if they create a crisis big enough to divert the nation's 
attention from the scandal. Perhaps a war, maybe with Albania. "Why 
Albania?" asks Ames. "Why not," laughs Brean. To orchestrate the pretend 
war, he enlists the aid of Hollywood producer Stanley Motss (Dustin 
Hoffman,) who is more than happy to help. "You know, there's not an 
Academy Award for producers," he moans, "Why is that? Do they think these 
things produce themselves?"
Motss quickly plots out the scenario for the crisis, then pulls together 
his experts to work on the really important stuff; the war's official 
slogan, theme song and merchandising tie-ins. When "that yellow ribbon 
business" is mentioned, Ames interrupts to explain that the yellow 
ribbons were a naturally occurring phenomenon. She stops short though, 
when she notices Brean smiling wearily at her naiveté.
And so the scam begins, with Brean instructing a White House Press 
Secretary to tell reporters that there is absolutely no truth to the 
rumors about problems in Albania relating to the B-3 bomber. When 
reminded that there is no B-3 bomber, Brean smiles confidently and says, 
"Exactly." The White House press corps dutifully responds to the bait, 
and within hours the nation is riveted to their TV sets, watching the 
latest on the crisis in Albania. 
David Mamet and Hilary Henkin's screenplay, based on the book by Larry 
Beinhart, is incredibly slick and fast-moving, operating on the 
assumption that movie-goers are savvy enough to roll with the concept. 
And, thanks to the surreal political realities of today, the absurdist 
story seems all too possible.
Barry Levinson is a uneven director, turning out a few great works ("Rain 
Man") and some real dogs ("Toys",) but he's in top form here. He shot 
"Wag The Dog" in just 29 days, and the film has an immediacy that keeps 
the proceedings buoyant. His camera work displays a breezy confidence and 
a great sense of play. It's obvious the director was having a wonderful 
time turning out this wicked little film.
Of course, it would be hard not to have fun with a cast like this. Anne 
Heche has a beguiling effervescence as the president's assistant. 
Winifred Ames may be new to deception at such a massive scale, but she 
hops right in and does her part. Robert De Niro exudes an ominous 
confidence as the man making the big decisions. His exact title is never 
divulged; you simply understand that when things go wrong, he's the guy 
you call to fix them. His role is much like Harvey Keitel's suave mob 
character in "Pulp Fiction," which makes perfect sense in this perverse 
context. Adding to the lunacy is Woody Harrelson in a deliciously twisted 
cameo as the designated hero for the bogus war.
But despite the fine performances of the rest of the cast, it's Dustin 
Hoffman who steals the show with his Oscar-worthy portrayal of producer 
Stanley Motss. Rich, spoiled and self-obsessed, Motss is a fascinating 
character. Mid-way through the film, when the opposition catches on and 
orchestrates a televised announcement that the war has ended, Motss 
explodes, shouting "Over?! This war isn't over until I say it's over!" To 
Hoffman's credit, you don't doubt him for a second.   
Skirting the line between preposterousness and uncomfortable plausibility,
 "Wag The Dog" is a nightmarish delight that invites comparisons to such 
great satires as "Network" and "Dr. Strangelove." Prepare to laugh 
yourself silly, and let's all pray that the film is less true than it 
seems to be.

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Robert De Niro, Dustin Hoffman, Anne Heche, Woody Harrelson, Denis
Leary, Andrea Martin, Willie Nelson, Suzie Plakson, Kirsten Dunst,
William H. Macy Director: Barry Levinson Screenplay: David Mamet &
Hilary Henkin, based on the book by Larry Beinhart
What a silly name for a movie that's all about deception and the use of
tele-media to deceive a nation (USA), in the upcoming Presidential
Elections. The saying goes - a dog will wag it's tail, but if the tail
is smarter than the dog, it will WAG THE DOG. I get it  meaning the
president is the rear end and the American people are comparative to a
dog's body. But wouldn't a better title be HOW MANY WAYS CAN YOU WANK A
GREAT NATION?
The entire premise and punch line for the movie rests on the absurdly
hilarious, although very possible situations created by the US
Presidential Party into making their country believe that they are at
war with another nation (Albania of all places). The idea is divert
attention away from the President's sexual misconduct with a girl scout,
in order to win the upcoming elections in the remaining few days. This
is overall fun, especially the recreated scenes of an Albanian refugee
(Kirsten Dunst) escaping from terrorist fire, the production of the
sentimental, ever reliable war hero trapped behind enemy lines (Woody
Harrelson), and Willie Nelson's wonderful song making talents used to
recreate heart moving lyrical tunes about Old Shoes'. The idea is
refreshing and entertaining, but also a sad miscalculation by Barry
Levinson (director), in relying so heavily on this one movie gimmick
which eventually runs dry.
The Hollywood producer of the entire scam is Dustin Hoffman, who is not
particularly exciting, but gets an Academy nomination for his
performance anyway. Robert De Niro or Anne Heche are otherwise plausible
as Presidential campaigners who work hard to win the election.
This movie explores some interesting intellectual, conceptual ideas
about media brainwashing and how gullible we are as people. Did man
truly walk on the moon, did everything about the Gulf War happen as we
saw it on TV, or was it all just some contrived propaganda put there by
some government funded movie studio? Probably not, but there may come a
day when Big Brother will have the power to do so.
Timothy Voon
e-mail: stirling@netlink.com.au
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Tim+Voon
http://www.labyrinth.net.au/~bouclier/week/movies.html

Author
Jason Wallis
"Wag the Dog" * * * * 
Starring Dustin Hoffman, Robert DeNiro, Anne Heche, Denis Leary, William H.
Macy, Willie Nelson, Kirsten Dunst, Craig T. Nelson, Woody Harrelson and
James Belushi 
Directed by Barry Levinson 
"Why does a dog wag it's tail? Because a dog is smarter than it's tail. If
the tail was smarter, the tail would wag the dog." 
There is a quality that Barry Levinson's new film "Wag the Dog" possesses
that I have not seen pulled off since Kubrick's "Dr. Strangelove":
brilliant political satire. In all the years that have come and gone since
Kubrick's apocalyptic vision of nuclear war, not one single film has
managed to create satire that deserves comparison. 
I'm sure that by now everyone knows the all-to-familiar (*cough, cough*)
premise of the film: the White House calls in a spin doctor (Robert DeNiro,
in his best performance in years) to play Mr. Fixit when the President
becomes embroiled in a sex scandal involving a much younger woman (again,
*cough, cough*). In turn, DeNiro employs the help of a Hollywood producer
(Dustin Hoffman) to aid him in creating a fake war (oh, excuse me, pageant)
with Albania in order to divert attention from the big cheese's scandal. 
Meanwhile, the President's opponent (a wasted Craig T. Nelson) is planning
to air commercials about the scandal set to the tune "Thank Heaven for
Little Girls". Not good. So they need to get this thing moving fast and
they do so by hiring an array of quirky characters to help move the "war"
along by means of theme songs, catch phrases and fake heroes. 
To say any more would almost be a crime against humanity, so I will leave
it at that. But what ensues is one of the freshest, funniest and just plain
cool flicks to come out of the last decade. The cast puts so much effort
and charm into their roles that, just because of them, it's hard not to
like the movie. I mean, there's just something so cool about hearing
Hoffman quip "That's not a problem." that it just can't be explained. It
has to be seen. 
Just from hearing the plot of the movie, I was curious to see how Levinson
would pull of such an absurd and outrageous plot. Well, he does so.
Brilliantly, I might add. But "Wag the Dog" is far more than a great
political comedy, but it is also a perfectly executed send up of today's
Hollywood that should not (and I hope will not) be forgotten soon. 
However, as fresh and funny as "Wag the Dog" is, it is also extremely
creepy, especially due to the recent spiel involving our president, Mr.
Clinton. It's not all that improbable that this kind of thing could happen.
I'm not saying we're suddenly going to go head-to- head with Iraq or
anything, I'm just stating that it's not all that outragious that someone
could actually do this. Kind of sends a chill up your spine, actually. 
There was a sad shortage of truly great films last year. There are only
about three films that I would consider truly brilliant (this is one of
them, by the way). Now, I haven't seen most of the "elite" films to come
out of 1997 (i.e. "The Ice Storm", "Boogie Nights", "The Sweet Hereafter",
etc.), but I find it rather hard to believe that very many movies could be
better than this is. 
Of course, you know that this isn't going to get the recognition it
deserves come Oscar time. It's too smart and clever for it's own good.
Everyone knows that Hollywood never awards fresh filmmaking. They like to
give the honors to "epic" movies like "The English Patient" and
"Braveheart". I'm not saying that there's anything wrong with those movies;
I thought they were actually pretty good. But Best Picture? No way. That
award should go an original, semi-offbeat film that actually makes us think
about the world we live in. "Wag the Dog" does just that like no movie I've
seen in a long, long time. 
Check out Jason Wallis' Filmaholics Anonymous web page at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Author
Andy Wright
Directed by Barry Levinson (Rain Man, Toys, Avalon)
Written for the screen by Hillary Henkin and David Mamet (Oleanna, 
Homicide) from the novel American Hero by Larry Beinhart
Starring: Dustin Hoffman, Robert Deniro, Willie Nelson, Denis Leary
Year of Release: 1997
Rating: R
Deserves Recognition for: Actor (Hoffman), and an almost Criswell-like 
ability to anticipate a certain current scandal
Capsule Review:
    This ultra-satirical comedy has a great writer (David Mamet), an 
exemplary cast (Hoffman, Deniro, Anne Heche, and Woody Harrelson to name 
a few), and a killer, eerily prescient, hook (in order to get a 
struggling President reelected , Hollywood & Washington team up to 
declare war on an unsuspecting Albania), - so why isn't it funnier, 
dammit? Director Barry Levinson, whose comedic sense has drastically 
slipped since the days of DINER and TIN MEN, struggles to find the right 
tone here, resulting in a film that, for every scene of genuine 
hilarity, all too often just lies there smirking at itself about how 
darn clever it is. Still, there are some truly inspired bits, and 
Hoffman does his best work in years as a thinly-veiled caricature of the 
legendarily egomaniacal producer Robert Evans. If for no other reason, 
watch it sometime for William H. Macy's cameo as a secret agent with 
some definite views on Mexican Desserts.
Copyright 1998 by The Critic formerly known as Andrew Wright
For more insanely biased reviews, check out http://www.seanet.com/~louk/
e-mail louk@seanet.com

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Hilary Henkin and David Mamet, from the novel AMERICAN HERO
by Larry Beinhart
Starring: Dustin Hoffman, Robert De Niro, Anne Heche, Denis Leary,
Willie Nelson, Woody Harrelson
Synopsis: 
Does a dog wag its tail, or does the tail ever wag the dog? Do events
drive publicity or do publicity specialists drive events? In WAG THE
DOG, it's definitely PR wonks who drive events. This fun spoof is a
behind-the-scenes look at the mechanics of manipulating the American
public - - how over-the-top moguls in Washington and Hollywood use  the
media to control public opinion. Eleven days before the Presidential
election, Presidential aide Winifred (Anne Heche), political spin doctor
Conrad (Robert De Niro), and Hollywood producer Stanley (Dustin Hoffman)
are charged with a monumental publicity project. Although the President
has a comfortable 17% lead in the polls against his opponent, a breaking
new sex scandal concerning the President and a teenage girl threatens to
derail his upcoming reelection. Winifred, Conrad, and Stanley are hired
to distract the public's opinion from the sex scandal. To rally the
American people around the President as well as temporarily take all the
attention away from the sex scandal story, the three spin doctors
produce a fake war between America and Albania in their little movie
studio - - complete with heroes, victims, music, press conferences and
disaster footage. Just as Ronald Reagan's real life inexplicable flash
invasion of Grenada diverted public attention from what certainly would
have been public outcry over the murder of over 200 marines in Beirut,
the three spin doctors figure they can divert attention away from the
President's dubious morality by convincing America it is at war - - just
long enough to ensure the President's reelection. Will the eleven-day
ruse succeed?
Opinion:
I figure the average Hollywood movie these days costs 60 million dollars
to make and takes 90 days to film. Frankly, WAG THE DOG is a much better
movie, and it only cost 15 million to make and thirty days to film. WAG
THE DOG is a fine screenplay with superb acting and a resounding message
as well. The running gag is that the publicity is all fake, and the
public is eating it up.
Although in theory the American government has three branches
(executive, legislative, judicial), in practice it has four. The media
is the fourth branch of government, and we all know in our hearts that
American public opinion is regularly manipulated by media-savvy spin
doctors in Hollywood and Washington, espousing various angles for
economic or political gain. 
A racial minority allegedly kills a white. Which angle sells more
papers? In the O.J. Simpson case the press played the race card. In
Cunanan/Versace (Cunanan was Filipino) the press played the gay card.
Impartial news, or just angles for making more money? A Middle Eastern
minority male associated with arms dealing and his white girlfriend die
in a drunk driving accident, not wearing seat belts. Which angle sells
the most papers? The drunk driving angle, or "Princess' Fairy Tale Life
Gets Cut Short."  The answer, of course, is the fairy tale sells more -
- especially if it comes with commercial tie-ins such as tribute CDs
made from re-hashed songs to Marilyn Monroe, with advertisements for the
next album on the back, and perhaps film rights later on. Let's ask
ourselves. Are we being hooked and played for dollars by Hollywood and
Washington spin doctors?

Author
E. Benjamin Kelsey
It's a good thing WAG THE DOG didn't use some of the special effects Robert
Zemeckis favors (and heavily showed off in CONTACT), because if President
Clinton had been "morphed" into the film, Barry Levinson may have become the
Nostradamus of modern political scandal. Perhaps a sequel is in order, and
this time we *can* put Clinton in it, and this time we'll also show the
President's mistress (Monica Lewinsky superimposed into the scene), and this
time when Bubba bares all, we'll simply call it FLUBBER 2. Or, with Clinton
and Lewinsky both blended into the picture, maybe the suitable title will be
SPLICE WORLD. Oh what fun we can have watching Bill do a bad Blues Brother
impression, blaring on his saxophone while Lewinsky sings a catchy dance-pop
tune. ("If you wanna be my lover, you gotta get with the Pres"?)
One must admit, the latest White House scandal riding the coattails of WAG THE
DOG's national release is more than interesting. Who would've thought this
movie would serve as the opening act to a scandal that has gone on to dominate
headlines and news magazines for the past few months? I can only assume it has
helped WAG THE DOG bring in more business as residents of the good ole U.S.A.
flock into theaters to see how closely the outside world parallels that on the
big screen. But WAG THE DOG's focus remains more on covering the scandal than
on the scandal itself. When the President is accused of sexual misconduct
around election time, he enlists the aid of the White House's top spin doctor,
Conrad Brean (Robert De Niro), to deviate the public's attention from such
crushing allegations. In turn, Conrad enlists the aid of acclaimed Hollywood
producer Stanley Motts (Hoffman) to fabricate some overseas conflicts . . .
not quite a war, but a "pageant".
Picking Albania as the hot spot to ensure Americans' knowledge will remain
minimal, Motts hires some of his best to create "genuine" news footage,
legendary heros, and even an overly patriotic theme song. The acting is sharp,
the script clever, but there is also plenty to improve on. WAG THE DOG is too
much idea and not enough story. The pacing is hectic, creating the right
atmosphere for what's going on onscreen, but as beautifully presented as it
is, it would work much better as a thirty minute short. While one can easily
walk away from this film appreciating its biting satire and powerful cast, it
doesn't stretch far beyond a really, really good idea. Speaking for myself, I
want just a bit more.
De Niro has received quite a bit of praise for his role here, and although he
was delightfully on key, it is Hoffman who gives the only truly stellar
performance. It's obvious this project was a bit of a trip to the candy store
for both Levinson and Hoffman. The acting adrenaline is high, and Hoffman
reflects it well. On the other hand, we also have Anne Heche as White House
aide Winifred Ames. If you believe this movie, it appears that White House
aides do nothing more than sit around looking bored out of their minds. Heche
seems to add nothing more than a tranquil backdrop to an otherwise eccentric
cast of chatter-box characters.
Not only the direction of the film is hectic - the camera work by Robert
Richardson is also a bit hyper, with sudden unnecessary zooms and pans that
made me dizzy. It's a bit distracting when you feel like you're watching a
political documentary shot by Mtv. Still, the intelligent comedy is a rare
thing nowadays, and this one is incredibly smart. For that aspect alone, WAG
THE DOG is one to see. With all the hoopla over Clinton going on however, it's
not much of an escape from the real world.

Author
David N. Butterworth
"Wag the Dog" isn't a bad film by any means.  In fact, it's thoroughly
enjoyable.  But its comedy is better described as frothy and lightweight
than biting and satirical.
Some clues become evident early on.  The tag line uses a structure that has
been done to death: "A comedy about truth, justice, and other special
effects."  The pre-credits explanation of the title phrase is simply
unnecessary.  And almost everything else feels familiar, as if begged,
borrowed, or stolen from other films.
Robert De Niro plays Conrad Brean, a "Mr. Fix-It" recruited by government
officials to help the President out of a tight spot.  Eleven days before
the election our nation's leader has been caught with his hands in the
cookie jar--a sex scandal with an underage girl scout.  Conrad needs a
distraction before the story breaks.  Something big.  How about...a war?
With, er...Albania?  Not a real war, of course.  "A pageant."
Conrad trots off to seek the assistance of Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman),
a Hollywood producer whose home is bigger than the White House.  Stanley,
who's never won an award of any kind (since no one understands producers),
sees this fabricated conflict as his big opportunity, his "Doctor Zhivago,"
if you will.  Much humor is derived from the fact that Stanley is always
intoning "this is *nothing*!" when things start getting out of hand.  "Try
a ten o'clock pitch meeting coked to the gills and you haven't even read
the treatment!  *That's* hard."
With "Wag the Dog," Hoffman continues to prove he's one of the most
versatile actors around.  De Niro, no slouch either, has a more subdued
role in the picture; the two of them play off each other like Bert and
Ernie.
Anne Heche, perhaps better known for her off-screen role than her on-screen
characterizations, is efficient and spunky as White House aide Winifred
Ames.  Willie Nelson has a small but cute bit as--what else--a
country/western songwriter churning out patriotic pop.  In fact, with the
exception of Woody Harrelson, whose loonie-with-bad-teeth-in-a-wool-cap
character is starting to get real old real fast, the cast is nicely
balanced.
Director Barry Levinson reportedly pulled all this together in a scant four
weeks.  With that in mind, the film is remarkably well crafted--breezy
camerawork, careful staging, lots of zingy, David Mamet-penned dialogue,
and twangy, toe-tapping music by Dire Straits-man Mark Knopfler.
The idea of marketing a war out of political need was more broadly realized
in "Canadian Bacon," an under-appreciated 1994 comedy that starred the late
great John Candy.  As for a scathing satire of the news media, Paddy
Chayefsky's brilliant "Network" has yet to find an equal.  For a biting
satirical comedy, see "The Player."  Or "Broadcast News."  Or "The Great
McGinty."  The list goes on.
While "Wag the Dog" doesn't have as much bite as any of those films, it's
still an entertaining movie-going experience.

Author
Homer Yen
It's just days before the Presidential election, and the incumbent is
enjoying a slim lead over his opponent.  However, a scandal hits the
White House while the President is away.  A Firefly girl (similar to a
Girl Scout) accuses the President of sexual misconduct.   Tabloids
will feast on this development.  His opponent makes every opportunity
of it to drag him through the mud in his own bid for the presidency.
The country is aghast.  Trouble looms large.  Who ya gonna call?
Conrad Brean (Robert De Niro) is the man that you want.  With a knack
for misdirection and strategizing, he must come up with some kind of
plan to divert America and the media's attention just long enough for
the President to win another term.  But desperate times call for
desperate measures, so with the help of a White House aide (Anne
Heche); crafty movie producer, Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman); and an
overzealous marketing pro, Fad King (Dennis Leary), they begin to
concoct, develop, and refine a lie that must not only be
extraordinary, but also believable.  Indeed, these spin doctors have
the unenviable task of trying to spin gold from straw.
"Wag the Dog" is not what I would characterize to be a comedy or a
drama.  It plays out more like a melodrama that focuses on
quick-on-your-feet cunning displayed by those spin doctors, who are in
essence idea hamsters (their brains are constantly running).  We sit
in our chairs and observe how the characters on screen react to the
various crises that arise.  They are like pinballs, bouncing and
ricocheting from one idea to another as they try to pull off the
greatest of illusions, yet make it seem soberingly realistic.  
What I found particularly interesting (or scary) is how these two work
to bring about plausibility. Brean, skulking and ever-molding his
political machinations, is adept at manipulation.  Meanwhile, Motss
knows that there's a way around every problem.  Whenever there is a
kink in their plans, he boasts with deluded optimism: "It's nothing!"
And, voila, another plan is in place.  In doing so, they
simultaneously attempt to bolster the President's ratings, increasing
America's moral, and evoke a satisfying sense of jingoism.
"Wag the Dog" is blithely acted but will not leave any kind of impact.
Still, this film has its merits.  It is an odd lesson in politics.
Particularly, it offers a look at the people who are behind the
scenes.  They may be the most powerful people in the world who not
only have carte blanche status but can also shape the opinions of the
mass public.  Are we as truly as informed as we would like to think?
Perhaps after seeing this movie, you'll understand what 'wagging the
dog' really means.

Author
George Wilcox
CLICK ON CAROLINE.
Dear Caroline Film Reviews: http://www.geocites.com/Hollywood/Studio/7066
Here's a movie, director Barry Levinson's latest filmed in just 29
days, that takes Ivan Reitman's "Dave" to another extreme.
Co-written by former Chicagoan David Mamet, it's a dark comedy about
how White House aides and spin doctors manipulate the news for the
sake of saving their jobs and their president's image. Presumably, not
in that order.
Rollins was Ronald Reagan's bearded campaign manager, a master at
images such as the "Evil Empire," and Evans is the perpetually tanned
producer ("Chinatown") and former Paramount studio boss ("Love Story"
and "The Godfather").
Robert De Niro stars as Conrad Brean, the professorial-looking spin
doctor known as Mr. Fix It, who is brought into the White House for an
emergency when the President is caught in a sexual molestation scandal
involving a Firefly girl less than two weeks before the election.
In a meeting held deep in the White House basement, on a set right out
of Stanley Kubrick's "Dr. Strangelove," Brean introduces the
non-existant B-3 Bomber and orders the President to become ill while
in China for a trade mission. The point? Take the focus off the
Firefly girl scandal by getting the media to focus on something else.
Brean, along with presidential aide Winifred Ames (Ann Heche), travels
to L.A. to meet with Hollywood producer Stanley Motss (Dustin
Hoffman). Brean needs Motss' help to engineer a fake war with Albania.
The film, based on Larry Beinhart's novel "American Hero," has many
targets to spoof from Grenada to the Persian Gulf War, to yellow
ribbons, "We Are the World," and country singer Lee Greenwood.
Motss brings in his own crew of spin doctors, including songwriter
John Dean (Willie Nelson), the Fad King (Denis Leary) and fashion guru
Liz (Andrea Martin).
In small performances, Kirsten Dunst plays a girl caught in war-torn
Albania and Woody Harrelson is a freaked-out war hero.
It seemed appropriate "Primary Colors" starring John Travolta was
among the trailers, another story about spin doctors manipulating a
presidential election inspired by Joe Klein's (aka Anonymous) novel
based on the Clinton campaign.
"Wag the Dog" features crackerjack dialogue and engaging performances
by De Niro and Hoffman. The film's only troubles occur in the final 30
minutes when the story turns surreal, almost too good to be
true. Maybe that's just the point Levinson was trying to make. That
everything about politics is too good to be true.
It's a fun romp for true cynics about the politic process. I think
even Jefferson Smith would laugh.

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Somewhere lost in WAG THE DOG's 97 minutes is a bright, funny,
pointed, and even frightening 20- minute film.  The film makes some
good points about the state of political images, about technology, and
about the American public.  But the film says it all concisely fairly
quickly, then says it again, then for good measure says it again.
Eventually the movie which from the outside would seem short out-stays
its welcome.  It is surprising that Barry Levinson thought that he
could get by with one-dimensional characters in so repetitious a story
however engaging and important the central idea was.  Levinson knows
the value of good characters.  He built his reputation with DINER and
he directed AVALON.  Both are films with very real, very believable
characters.  This instead is an idea film, but it gives us the same
idea over and over. The script is by Harry Henkin and David Mamet based
on the novel AMERICAN HERO by Larry Beinhart. It tells us that what we
remember from the wars of our past are images and ceremonies.  For
example, from World War II we remember the raising of the flag at Iwo
Jima and a sailor kissing a girl in New York City when the war is
over--the visual images of that war that had power.  From Vietnam we
remember a young girl running screaming in a street after a napalm
attack; then there is the illegal pistol execution in another street.
These images could always have been orchestrated and many probably
were.  And as time has passed the creation of these images has only
become easier and less expensive with techniques like digital image
processing.  The government feeds us images rather than facts, or at
least such is the implication of WAG THE DOG.
     It is less than two weeks to the national election and the
President is in big trouble.  It seems he is accused of sexually
abusing a Firefly Girl, part of a troop visiting the Capital Building.
(I know that our current President is unpopular in some quarters, but
even so this seems like a somewhat exaggerated premise.)  An image
expert, Conrad Brean (Robert DeNiro), is called in protect the
President from the accusation and after some deliberation he determines
that the best strategy is to give the President a military victory in
the few days before the election.  A war has to appear to start up and
the President has to appear to win the war in just the short period of
time before the election.  Brean determines that the winning approach
is to fabricate a war with Albania.  To bring off such a war he needs
the help of a top Hollywood producer.  His choice is the handsome,
graying Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman).
     From there the film goes into a series of repetitious cycles.
First there is the brainstorming session where Brean and Motss talk in
understated tone about what sort of an image they need to impress the
public.  Not surprisingly, this sounds almost like they are planning
for the production of a film.  They hit on some idea upon which they
can agree.  The suggestion is actually produced and we see a few of the
steps that go into the production to make it seem possible.  Finally we
see the final implementation as the public would see it and it is some
variation on some image that inspired the public in some previous war.
A song will sound very much like a song we remember, or some monument
to the war heroes will look like some famous monument, aut cetera.
Binding these cycles together is a bit of a plot, but not much of one.
     The film offers two good actors in the lead roles, Dustin Hoffman
and Robert DeNiro.  But there is little in this film to give much of a
clue to who these people really are beyond what their jobs are.
However, DeNiro plays his role a bit suppressed and Hoffman takes
advantage of this to appear a much more outgoing person amused by the
political machinations and his new-found power.  The two are
accompanied by Anne Heche, who seems to have been added to this film as
an after-thought.  She has little to do but tag along.
     People who are nearer to either the film industry or the political
process may find that there is much in this film that is on-target, but
for many viewers this film will be an argument that there is still a
place for the short film and perhaps it should be used more often.  I
rate this film a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Author
Kristian Lin
Director Barry Levinson shot WAG THE DOG in 29 days, which was smart
strategy.  The film doesn't feel slapped together, but captures the
feverish pace of a presidential campaign's waning days.  Levinson's 
filmmaking hasn't had this much energy since his early career.  He
seemed to be in an irreversible decline, turning out dreck like
DISCLOSURE and SLEEPERS.  But his artistic talents have only been
hibernating.  With his fellow-travelling scriptwriter Paul Attanasio, he
has been an unseen power behind some of the decade's most thoughtful
movies (QUIZ SHOW, DONNIE BRASCO) as well as one of TV's best shows 
("Homicide: Life on the Street").  WAG THE DOG reveals that he has been
a guerrilla filmmaker all along.
When the President is caught in a sex scandal shortly before an
election, his aide Winifred Ames (Anne Heche) hires political consultant
Conrad Brean (Robert De Niro), who brings in Hollywood producer Stanley
Motss (Dustin Hoffman).  Their idea is to divert attention from the
President's misbehavior by faking a war between the U.S. and Albania.
Most of this movie's juice comes from the teaming of De Niro and
Hoffman, who both turn in their best work in years.  De Niro knows that
the other part's the showboat, so he plays the straight man to great 
effect.  His cool, low-key style hides an unflappable authority that
makes him the rock amid the campaign's welter of activity.
Hoffman's performance, though, is the real marvel.  Stanley Motss is a
natural at politics: he's always responding to the latest crisis with a
jolly "This is nothing!"  Hoffman gives us an egomaniac who's seen 
everything, but also homes in on the relish with which the movie
producer does his job.  Motss is no artist, but he's a creative genius
of a hasty, improvisatory sort who's always bubbling over with ideas.  I
wish we could have seen the kind of movies he makes - is he Saul Zaentz,
Harvey Weinstein, or Jerry Bruckheimer?  (My guess is the latter.)  This
is the most compelling portrait of a Hollywood suit since Tim Robbins's
Griffin Mill in THE PLAYER.  They may both be soulless money men with a
deep contempt for audiences, but Motss is far more likeable than the
paranoid, humorless Mill.
The problem is the movie shares his contempt.  It assumes unthinking,
monolithic response from the people and the media.  WAG THE DOG would
have been more interesting exploring the ways in which different
segments of the culture react to media hype.  It's uncharacteristic of
writer David Mamet to be so shallow (he shares script credit with Hilary
Henkin, but there's some dispute as to her contribution, and this movie
plays as a Mamet script anyway).  The movie's cynicism is cheap,
arrogant, and almost succeeds in being a real turn-off, especially at
the end, when they try to create a war hero out of a psychotic rapist
(Woody Harrelson).  It could have worked if the movie had had some of
the sheer comic lunacy of DUCK SOUP or DR. STRANGELOVE to leaven
things.  The Coen brothers could have done that, but it isn't Mamet and
Levinson's game.
Heche's character is a third wheel (the usual situation for a woman in a
Mamet production).  Ames's purpose in the story is to fret when the
situation gets tense and then gape at the old pros' public-relations
wizardry, but Heche makes both states of mind watchably funny.  Willie
Nelson and Jay Leno are great as a drug-addled folk balladeer and a
standup comic who tells bad jokes, respectively.  And William H. Macy 
gives the movie a jolt as a starchy CIA agent who knows what's going
down ("When the fit hits the shan, someone's going to have to stay after
school," he chirps).  WAG THE DOG is too glib to be a great political
satire, but it's a sign that Barry Levinson hasn't lost his filmmaking
skills.

Author
Christopher Null
     Another year-end flick with another four-star rating?  What, am I nuts,
or just some corporate tool shilling for would-be Oscar contenders?
     Never mind that I am saving up all my *real* praise for SPICEWORLD next
week... I'll try to lay it on again for WAG THE DOG.  It's a great little
premise: what would happen if you tried to produce a phony war as a diversion
away from a lecherous President's leisure time?  A lot of wacky hijinks, from
the looks of it!  With everything from a "We Are the World" parody to a
memorial for a P.O.W., WAG THE DOG is really just a send-up of America's
fascination with war from WWII through the Gulf War, where combat truly became
a ridiculous exercise in soundbites and TV footage.
     The story is good, the comedy is goofy but still solid, but it's Dustin
Hoffman that is the crown jewel of the film, hamming it up as a kind of C.C.
De Mille-meets-Liberace egomaniac/movie producer.  De Niro's understated
cover-up man is also good, and Anne Heche's Prince Valiant haircut is
interesting, at the very least.
     Finally, the commentary on our society is pretty rich, and I can't help
but think that a lot of people are going to be subtly offended by this movie. 
I think that pleases me most of all.  You see, as WAG THE DOG states, modern
war really is a "pageant."  It's more dangerous to drive to work than hit the
front lines... if there are any lines, that is.  Is it live, or is it Memorex?
 What's the difference?
Director: Barry Levinson
Producer: Robert De Niro, Barry Levinson, Jane Rosenthal
Writer: Hilary Henkin, David Mamet
Starring: Dustin Hoffman, Robert De Niro, Anne Heche, Denis Leary, Willie Nelson
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Michael Redman
As the American public has become increasingly aware in recent years, politics
is mostly smoke and mirrors. The truth of a situation is less important than
the spin and there's so much spinning in Washington DC it's a wonder the city
stays in the same location day after day.
It's 11 days before the election and the President is in trouble. He's accused
by a teenage "Firefly Girl" of pressing the flesh a bit too literally in the
Oval Office. It's time to do something...anything...about it.
Enter Conrad Bream (Robert De Niro), a "fixer" of the highest magnitude.
Bream's take on the situation is that they need something to distract the
press until after the vote. What could be more important than the Chief
Executive's sexual indiscretions? How about a war with, oh maybe, Albania?
Not a real war of course, but a media creation to distract the public. To pull
off the hoax, Bream and White House aid Winifred Ames (Anne Heche) enlist
Hollywood producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman). Motss is into it: this will
be his greatest accomplishment.
Bream starts off by ordering a leak that the President's extended stay in
China has nothing to do with deploying the new B3 bomber. Not only that, but
there is no B3 bomber. When told by staffers that there really is no B3
bomber, he replies "Of course." Deny it and everyone will be convinced that it exists.
The "war" jumps into production with a battle scene shot on a studio stage
complete with digitally dubbed village backgrounds, gun fire, flames and a
little white kitten in a peasant girl's arms. A planned media event for when
the President does return to the country requires rain. When they find out
that there will be no rain in Washington, the plane is diverted to Florida so
he can give his coat to an Albanian mother thanking him for fighting the
terrorists. Nothing is left to chance.
When they do run into problems, Motss takes it in stride. "You think this is
hard?" he explains, "Try a 10:00 am pitch meeting coked to the gills and you
haven't even read the treatment. That's hard. This is easy." He's in charge.
The opposition catches on to the ruse and announces that the war is over.
"Over?" the producer shouts, "This war isn't over until I say it's over!"
The film drives home the power of television. Bream's reply is "The war is
over. I saw it on television." The public swallows the deception with a spoon
and the Firefly incident is safely buried .
The three take their project as far as it will go. Motss wants to nominate the
President for the Nobel Peace Prize because he brought peace to the war-torn
country. When reminded that there is no war, he explains "All the greater accomplishment."
His crew of experts works towards the illusion. The songwriter (Willie Nelson)
creates a "We Are The World" clone to promote patriotism. The Fad King (Denis
Leary) hatches a scheme to get the public involved. After all, you didn't
really think that those yellow ribbons for the hostages happened because of a
groundswell of grass roots support, did you?
The acting is exceptional. Hoffman and De Niro bounce off Heche's naive
politico admirably. The two actors have an easy friendship on screen that is
an absolute pleasure to watch. This is the first time that they have appeared
together (except for one scene in "Sleepers") and the chemistry is apparent.
In another review I mentioned that Jack Nicholson may possibly be the best
actor working today. If that's not true, Hoffman and De Niro are certainly
candidates for the throne.
Woody Harrelson turns in a well-done although small "Billy Bob" performance.
Peppered throughout the film are other clever cameos. Especially worth
watching is the duet between Nelson and Pops Staples.
Director Barry Levinson ("Tin Men", "Rainman") does an amazing job with David
Mamet's script (also credited to Hilary Henkin although Levinson insists that
Mamet wrote every word) considering that the film was made with a minuscule
budget ($15 million) and shot in only 29 days.
When the crew accidentally ran into President Clinton while filming, he asked
what the movie was about. In true form, the actors lied to him.
To pick nits, the introductory explanation of what the title means is
unnecessary and demeaning to the audience. We get the idea. It's also a
problem that the scheme would never actually work unless the United States
were completely isolated from the rest of the world. Are there no reporters
sent to Albania to cover the war? If you can force yourself to get past this,
everything else falls into place.
The final three minutes are a brave gambit. They completely change the mood of
the film and are sure to anger some viewers. It took me quite a while to
decide how I felt about the scene, but I finally understood that it added a
needed element to the film.
The message of the film is frighteningly accurate. In politics, it doesn't
matter what really happens, it only matters how it is handled. Whether the
President did indeed molest the girl is never answered because it is
irrelevant. In Washington the truth of Clinton's sexual activities isn't
really addressed. The important thing is how each sides handles the
accusation. Political news is often no more real than the most recent episode
of "Seinfeld".
(Michael Redman, after over 22 years of writing this column and much more
experience watching the comings and goings of politicians, no longer believes
anything. Email lies to redman@bvoice.com.)
[This appeared in the 1/15/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Steve Rhodes
     "We need a theme, a song, some visuals," presidential spin doctor
Conrad Brean explains, pitching his big project to Hollywood movie
producer Stanley Motss.  "It's a pageant.  It's like the Oscars.
That's why we need you."
     It's eleven days before the election and with the breaking
revelation that the president had molested a Firefly girl in the White
House, Conrad needs something to keep that story from making the front
pages.  Fast thinking Conrad knows just what they need, a small,
cost-effective war, which he euphemistically refers to as a pageant.
When asked with whom, he keeps responding, "I'm working on it."
Finally, he comes up with the relatively obscure Albania as the perfect
villain.  Not wanting to actually fight there, he has Stanley produce a
war image on a stage set.  The American public will never be the wiser,
and the president will be elected with patriotic fervor rather booted
out as morally bankrupt.
     Normally dramatic film director Barry Levinson, whose body of work
includes DINER, RAIN MAN, and SLEEPERS, delivers another hit in WAG THE
DOG, but this time it is a black comedy.  The exceedingly bright and
biting script by Hilary Henkin and the great David Mamet will remind
you of one current event after another.  Even in the most ridiculous
parts of the story, one's reaction is likely to be a double-take: an
"of course not," followed by a "well, maybe ..."
     In a film with a modest $15 million dollar budget, the stars still
shine brightly.  Dustin Hoffman, having the time of his life and
deserving an Oscar nomination, plays producer Stanley Motss.  Stanley
views his little war as his best piece of work ever.  He hires a famous
song writer, played by Willie Nelson, to produce a mass chorus song
that sounds similar to "We Are The World" but is called "We Have The
Right To Fight For Democracy."
     As Conrad Brean, Robert De Niro has a wry smile for every hardship
in the campaign.  He's seen it all and can confuse the media faster
than he can say that we are not sending B-3 bombers to Albania.  Leak
the story about the non-existent plane and then deny it, deny it, deny
it.  Now, that will certainly flummox the press and get the sexual
misconduct story buried on page 12.
     In my favorite performance in the movie, Anne Heche plays top
presidential aide Winifred Ames.  Normally in command, Winifred does
not know what to make of Conrad, who takes control of everything.  One
minute she tries to be tough, but the next she is looking wide-eyed at
Conrad's latest outlandish idea.  She always goes along, of course,
that is until William H. Macy appears in a small part as a CIA agent.
When trapped, she's willing to blame everyone and plead for mercy.
     The best sequence in the movie concerns the construction of the
war video to show on CNN and the other news networks.  First they hire
the right young actress, played by a distraught looking Kirsten Dunst,
to run away from her bomb ravaged village in Albania.  Filled on a
stage against a blue background, they carefully choose the right hamlet
for the backdrop, pick the right flames and sounds and, in the piece de
resistance, figure out the right pet for her to be clutching.  The
animal was to have been filmed live, but something came up so Stanley
gives her a large bag of Tostitos to hold instead.  They'll scan in a
cat in post-production.  The president, who is never seen, calls on the
cell phone to insist that they use a white cat.  This infuriates
Stanley, who hates it when his backers get in the way of his creative
decisions.
     Many other good actors show up as well in the film with Woody
Harrelson having an eye-opening small part, which cannot be described
without giving too much away.
     The main problem with the movie is that it is so hilarious that
you may have to see it twice to hear all the funny lines.  The audience
at our screening could barely control themselves.
     The opening credits answer the question you have about why the
movie is called WAG THE DOG: "Why does a dog wag its tail?  Because the
dog is smarter than the tail.  If the tail were smarter, it would wag
the dog."  And this marvelously funny film wags the audience until they
leave the theater limp from one belly laugh after another.
     WAG THE DOG runs a fast 1:35.  It is rated R for mature themes and
some profanity and would be fine for teenagers.

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The premise of Wag the Dog is so simple that it's adequately explained
by the commercials.  With 11 days to go until the election, the
President (who we never see) calls in political dirty-tricks artist
Robert DeNiro to distract attention from a burgeoning sex scandal.
DeNiro enlists Hollywood producer Dustin Hoffman to produce a "pageant",
a phony war against Albania, fought on the blue screens of Hollywood and
the recording studios of Nashville, with Woody Harrelson as the
reluctant, psychotic hero.  And if there wasn't anything more to the
movie than this, it would be a second-rate heist comedy at best,
enlivened by great actors -- like Sneakers Goes to Washington.  (A heist
comedy?  Yup.  DeNiro and Hoffman are "stealing" the election, so to
speak, and the movie is more about how they do it -- and the fun they
have doing it -- than anything else.)
Wag the Dog succeeds because it's based one great truth:  The American
people are stupid.  OK, maybe it's not "love thy neighbor as thyself" or
even "two plus two makes four", but a truth nonetheless.  (Any average
person who thinks that they're really smart about the two things this
movie satirizes -- moviemaking and the political process -- is invited,
nay, challenged, to spend a week either watching a movie actually being
made or 48 hours straight watching C-SPAN when the House is in
session.)  And because we're so utterly, predictably stupid, Hollywood
knows that a certain percentage of us will go see Hard Rain or Magoo,
Washington knows that  we won't notice a few million dollars spent here
and there on porno art grants and cigar subsidies -- and DeNiro's
character knows that American geography skills are so weak that we won't
be able to locate Albania on the map.
The beauty of Wag the Dog is that it isn't a light, meaningless comedy
about politics (like Speechless, the Michael Keaton - Geena Davis
picture) or from the level of light-hearted politcal satire to
near-greatness. Nor is it a hard-edged cynical look at the manner in
which a morally-deprived, ethically challenged baby-boomer connives his
sleazy way into the White House (like Primary Colors -- and yes, I am a
little disappointed in the way the last two elections turned out, thanks
for asking).  Instead, David Mamet's script strikes that delicate
balance between comedy and cynicism needed for satire.  It does this by
keeping us in a fantasy world where most of the schemers' schemes come
off beautifully, and fail only in entertaining and humorous fashion.
DeNiro is playing a variation on his  Al Capone character from The
Untouchables, without any of the violent rages. It's all:  "What do I
love?  What is it that brings me joy?  Baseball," minus the savage
bloody beating with the bat.  He threatens a lot of people, mind you,
but he's doing it in a very nice, polite way.  It's a very mellow,
restrained performance, which fits in with the air of gamesmanship in
the script.  Hoffman, on the other hand, is giddy, exuberant and
joyous.  This kind of thing is what his character lives for, and he's so
excited that he can't even shut up.  Even on the edge of disaster, he's
bright-eyed (behind oddly tinted sunglasses) and positive.  Insiders
note that he's basing his character on some powerful-but-anonymous
producer -- which may or may not be true, but Hoffman still exudes the
kind of lets-put-on-a-show electricity that you figure a producer needs
to have.
The best part and the most frustrating part of Wag the Dog is in the
supporting cast.  The characters are so well drawn and so well acted
that we want to see more of them, listen to them talk in that wised-up
Mamet dialogue, get to know them better -- which we don't.  Anne Heche,
is dead-bang-on in her portrayal of a political press aide -- cool and
composed on the outside, panicked and frenzied on the outside.  Denis
Leary (one of my favorite actors -- see The Ref) is the "Fad King", who
handles the profitable "back-end" -- T-shirt tie ins and shoe contracts
and other creative, innovative ways to separate a fool from his money.
They could make a whole movie, just about the Fad King, and I'd go see
it.  Willie Nelson and Merle Haggard handle the musical end of things
fabulously, from the upbeat gospel chorus theme song, to the weepy
country waltz, to the hilarious "Ballad of the Green Berets" parody.
Woody Harrelson has a brief, but memorable part as the overmedicated
"hero" of the Albanian conflict.  Craig T. Nelson, as the opposition
candidate, and the ever-reliable William H. Macy, as a wacky CIA agent,
are given surprisingly short shrift.  (One of my small gripes is that we
never see what the spin doctors on the other side are doing.)
Wag the Dog is a funny movie about serious problems:  the trivialization
of American politics, the role of the press in dumbing down the issues,
the impact of Hollywood in creating campaign commercials, the reduction
of all things political to soundbites and sidebars -- the list goes on.
We can solve most of these problems by taking a greater role in our
national life and educating ourselves as voters and citizens.  Wag the
Dog reminds us of what can happen if we don't.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"There's one thing that is forbidden on journeys by sled,
and that is whimpering.  Whining is a virus, a lethal,
infectious epidemic disease.  I refuse to listen to it."
  --  Peter Hoeg, "Smilla's Sense of Snow"
